Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB541.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 18A.225 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The term "employee" for purposes of this section means:
1. Any person, including an elected public official, who is regularly
employed by any department, office, board, agency, or branch of state
government; or by a public postsecondary educational institution; or by
any city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local
government, whose legislative body has opted to participate in the state-
sponsored health insurance program pursuant to KRS 79.080; and who
is either a contributing member to any one (1) of the retirement systems
administered by the state, including but not limited to the Kentucky
Retirement Systems, County Employees Retirement System, Kentucky
Teachers' Retirement System, the Legislators' Retirement Plan, or the
Judicial Retirement Plan; or is receiving a contractual contribution from
the state toward a retirement plan; or, in the case of a public
postsecondary education institution, is an individual participating in an
optional retirement plan authorized by KRS 161.567; or is eligible to
participate in a retirement plan established by an employer who ceases
participating in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System pursuant to
KRS 61.522 whose employees participated in the health insurance plans
administered by the Personnel Cabinet prior to the employer's effective
cessation date in the Kentucky Employees Retirement System;
2. Any certified or classified employee of a local board of education[ or a
public charter school as defined in KRS 160.1590];
3. Any elected member of a local board of education;
4. Any person who is a present or future recipient of a retirement
Page 1 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
allowance from the Kentucky Retirement Systems, County Employees
Retirement System, Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System, the
Legislators' Retirement Plan, the Judicial Retirement Plan, or the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System's optional
retirement plan authorized by KRS 161.567, except that a person who is
receiving a retirement allowance and who is age sixty-five (65) or older
shall not be included, with the exception of persons covered under KRS
61.702(2)(b)3. and 78.5536(2)(b)3., unless he or she is actively
employed pursuant to subparagraph 1. of this paragraph; and
5. Any eligible dependents and beneficiaries of participating employees
and retirees who are entitled to participate in the state-sponsored health
insurance program;
(b) The term "health benefit plan" for the purposes of this section means a health
benefit plan as defined in KRS 304.17A-005;
(c) The term "insurer" for the purposes of this section means an insurer as defined
in KRS 304.17A-005; and
(d) The term "managed care plan" for the purposes of this section means a
managed care plan as defined in KRS 304.17A-500.
(2) (a) The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, upon the
recommendation of the secretary of the Personnel Cabinet, shall procure, in
compliance with the provisions of KRS 45A.080, 45A.085, and 45A.090,
from one (1) or more insurers authorized to do business in this state, a group
health benefit plan that may include but not be limited to health maintenance
organization (HMO), preferred provider organization (PPO), point of service
(POS), and exclusive provider organization (EPO) benefit plans
encompassing all or any class or classes of employees. With the exception of
employers governed by the provisions of KRS Chapters 16, 18A, and 151B,
Page 2 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
all employers of any class of employees or former employees shall enter into
a contract with the Personnel Cabinet prior to including that group in the state
health insurance group. The contracts shall include but not be limited to
designating the entity responsible for filing any federal forms, adoption of
policies required for proper plan administration, acceptance of the contractual
provisions with health insurance carriers or third-party administrators, and
adoption of the payment and reimbursement methods necessary for efficient
administration of the health insurance program. Health insurance coverage
provided to state employees under this section shall, at a minimum, contain
the same benefits as provided under Kentucky Kare Standard as of January 1,
1994, and shall include a mail-order drug option as provided in subsection
(13) of this section. All employees and other persons for whom the health care
coverage is provided or made available shall annually be given an option to
elect health care coverage through a self-funded plan offered by the
Commonwealth or, if a self-funded plan is not available, from a list of
coverage options determined by the competitive bid process under the
provisions of KRS 45A.080, 45A.085, and 45A.090 and made available
during annual open enrollment.
(b) The policy or policies shall be approved by the commissioner of insurance
and may contain the provisions the commissioner of insurance approves,
whether or not otherwise permitted by the insurance laws.
(c) Any carrier bidding to offer health care coverage to employees shall agree to
provide coverage to all members of the state group, including active
employees and retirees and their eligible covered dependents and
beneficiaries, within the county or counties specified in its bid. Except as
provided in subsection (20) of this section, any carrier bidding to offer health
care coverage to employees shall also agree to rate all employees as a single
Page 3 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
entity, except for those retirees whose former employers insure their active
employees outside the state-sponsored health insurance program and as
otherwise provided in KRS 61.702(2)(b)3.b. and 78.5536(2)(b)3.b.
(d) Any carrier bidding to offer health care coverage to employees shall agree to
provide enrollment, claims, and utilization data to the Commonwealth in a
format specified by the Personnel Cabinet with the understanding that the data
shall be owned by the Commonwealth; to provide data in an electronic form
and within a time frame specified by the Personnel Cabinet; and to be subject
to penalties for noncompliance with data reporting requirements as specified
by the Personnel Cabinet. The Personnel Cabinet shall take strict precautions
to protect the confidentiality of each individual employee; however,
confidentiality assertions shall not relieve a carrier from the requirement of
providing stipulated data to the Commonwealth.
(e) The Personnel Cabinet shall develop the necessary techniques and capabilities
for timely analysis of data received from carriers and, to the extent possible,
provide in the request-for-proposal specifics relating to data requirements,
electronic reporting, and penalties for noncompliance. The Commonwealth
shall own the enrollment, claims, and utilization data provided by each carrier
and shall develop methods to protect the confidentiality of the individual. The
Personnel Cabinet shall include in the October annual report submitted
pursuant to the provisions of KRS 18A.226 to the Governor, the General
Assembly, and the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, an analysis of the
financial stability of the program, which shall include but not be limited to
loss ratios, methods of risk adjustment, measurements of carrier quality of
service, prescription coverage and cost management, and statutorily required
mandates. If state self-insurance was available as a carrier option, the report
also shall provide a detailed financial analysis of the self-insurance fund
Page 4 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
including but not limited to loss ratios, reserves, and reinsurance agreements.
(f) If any agency participating in the state-sponsored employee health insurance
program for its active employees terminates participation and there is a state
appropriation for the employer's contribution for active employees' health
insurance coverage, then neither the agency nor the employees shall receive
the state-funded contribution after termination from the state-sponsored
employee health insurance program.
(g) Any funds in flexible spending accounts that remain after all reimbursements
have been processed shall be transferred to the credit of the state-sponsored
health insurance plan's appropriation account.
(h) Each entity participating in the state-sponsored health insurance program shall
provide an amount at least equal to the state contribution rate for the employer
portion of the health insurance premium. For any participating entity that used
the state payroll system, the employer contribution amount shall be equal to
but not greater than the state contribution rate.
(3) The premiums may be paid by the policyholder:
(a) Wholly from funds contributed by the employee, by payroll deduction or
otherwise;
(b) Wholly from funds contributed by any department, board, agency, public
postsecondary education institution, or branch of state, city, urban-county,
charter county, county, or consolidated local government; or
(c) Partly from each, except that any premium due for health care coverage or
dental coverage, if any, in excess of the premium amount contributed by any
department, board, agency, postsecondary education institution, or branch of
state, city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local
government for any other health care coverage shall be paid by the employee.
(4) If an employee moves his or her place of residence or employment out of the
Page 5 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
service area of an insurer offering a managed health care plan, under which he or
she has elected coverage, into either the service area of another managed health care
plan or into an area of the Commonwealth not within a managed health care plan
service area, the employee shall be given an option, at the time of the move or
transfer, to change his or her coverage to another health benefit plan.
(5) No payment of premium by any department, board, agency, public postsecondary
educational institution, or branch of state, city, urban-county, charter county,
county, or consolidated local government shall constitute compensation to an
insured employee for the purposes of any statute fixing or limiting the
compensation of such an employee. Any premium or other expense incurred by any
department, board, agency, public postsecondary educational institution, or branch
of state, city, urban-county, charter county, county, or consolidated local
government shall be considered a proper cost of administration.
(6) The policy or policies may contain the provisions with respect to the class or classes
of employees covered, amounts of insurance or coverage for designated classes or
groups of employees, policy options, terms of eligibility, and continuation of
insurance or coverage after retirement.
(7) Group rates under this section shall be made available to the disabled child of an
employee regardless of the child's age if the entire premium for the disabled child's
coverage is paid by the state employee. A child shall be considered disabled if he or
she has been determined to be eligible for federal Social Security disability benefits.
(8) The health care contract or contracts for employees shall be entered into for a
period of not less than one (1) year.
(9) The secretary shall appoint thirty-two (32) persons to an Advisory Committee of
State Health Insurance Subscribers to advise the secretary or the secretary's
designee regarding the state-sponsored health insurance program for employees.
The secretary shall appoint, from a list of names submitted by appointing
Page 6 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
authorities, members representing school districts from each of the seven (7)
Supreme Court districts, members representing state government from each of the
seven (7) Supreme Court districts, two (2) members representing retirees under age
sixty-five (65), one (1) member representing local health departments, two (2)
members representing the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System, and three (3)
members at large. The secretary shall also appoint two (2) members from a list of
five (5) names submitted by the Kentucky Education Association, two (2) members
from a list of five (5) names submitted by the largest state employee organization of
nonschool state employees, two (2) members from a list of five (5) names submitted
by the Kentucky Association of Counties, two (2) members from a list of five (5)
names submitted by the Kentucky League of Cities, and two (2) members from a
list of names consisting of five (5) names submitted by each state employee
organization that has two thousand (2,000) or more members on state payroll
deduction. The advisory committee shall be appointed in January of each year and
shall meet quarterly.
(10) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the policy or policies
provided to employees pursuant to this section shall not provide coverage for
obtaining or performing an abortion, nor shall any state funds be used for the
purpose of obtaining or performing an abortion on behalf of employees or their
dependents.
(11) Interruption of an established treatment regime with maintenance drugs shall be
grounds for an insured to appeal a formulary change through the established appeal
procedures approved by the Department of Insurance, if the physician supervising
the treatment certifies that the change is not in the best interests of the patient.
(12) Any employee who is eligible for and elects to participate in the state health
insurance program as a retiree, or the spouse or beneficiary of a retiree, under any
one (1) of the state-sponsored retirement systems shall not be eligible to receive the
Page 7 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
state health insurance contribution toward health care coverage as a result of any
other employment for which there is a public employer contribution. This does not
preclude a retiree and an active employee spouse from using both contributions to
the extent needed for purchase of one (1) state sponsored health insurance policy
for that plan year.
(13) (a) The policies of health insurance coverage procured under subsection (2) of
this section shall include a mail-order drug option for maintenance drugs for
state employees. Maintenance drugs may be dispensed by mail order in
accordance with Kentucky law.
(b) A health insurer shall not discriminate against any retail pharmacy located
within the geographic coverage area of the health benefit plan and that meets
the terms and conditions for participation established by the insurer, including
price, dispensing fee, and copay requirements of a mail-order option. The
retail pharmacy shall not be required to dispense by mail.
(c) The mail-order option shall not permit the dispensing of a controlled
substance classified in Schedule II.
(14) The policy or policies provided to state employees or their dependents pursuant to
this section shall provide coverage for obtaining a hearing aid and acquiring hearing
aid-related services for insured individuals under eighteen (18) years of age, subject
to a cap of one thousand four hundred dollars ($1,400) every thirty-six (36) months
pursuant to KRS 304.17A-132.
(15) Any policy provided to state employees or their dependents pursuant to this section
shall provide coverage for the diagnosis and treatment of autism spectrum disorders
consistent with KRS 304.17A-142.
(16) Any policy provided to state employees or their dependents pursuant to this section
shall provide coverage for obtaining amino acid-based elemental formula pursuant
to KRS 304.17A-258.
Page 8 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
(17) If a state employee's residence and place of employment are in the same county,
and if the hospital located within that county does not offer surgical services,
intensive care services, obstetrical services, level II neonatal services, diagnostic
cardiac catheterization services, and magnetic resonance imaging services, the
employee may select a plan available in a contiguous county that does provide
those services, and the state contribution for the plan shall be the amount available
in the county where the plan selected is located.
(18) If a state employee's residence and place of employment are each located in
counties in which the hospitals do not offer surgical services, intensive care
services, obstetrical services, level II neonatal services, diagnostic cardiac
catheterization services, and magnetic resonance imaging services, the employee
may select a plan available in a county contiguous to the county of residence that
does provide those services, and the state contribution for the plan shall be the
amount available in the county where the plan selected is located.
(19) The Personnel Cabinet is encouraged to study whether it is fair and reasonable and
in the best interests of the state group to allow any carrier bidding to offer health
care coverage under this section to submit bids that may vary county by county or
by larger geographic areas.
(20) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the bid for proposals for health
insurance coverage for calendar year 2004 shall include a bid scenario that reflects
the statewide rating structure provided in calendar year 2003 and a bid scenario that
allows for a regional rating structure that allows carriers to submit bids that may
vary by region for a given product offering as described in this subsection:
(a) The regional rating bid scenario shall not include a request for bid on a
statewide option;
(b) The Personnel Cabinet shall divide the state into geographical regions which
shall be the same as the partnership regions designated by the Department for
Page 9 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
Medicaid Services for purposes of the Kentucky Health Care Partnership
Program established pursuant to 907 KAR 1:705;
(c) The request for proposal shall require a carrier's bid to include every county
within the region or regions for which the bid is submitted and include but not
be restricted to a preferred provider organization (PPO) option;
(d) If the Personnel Cabinet accepts a carrier's bid, the cabinet shall award the
carrier all of the counties included in its bid within the region. If the Personnel
Cabinet deems the bids submitted in accordance with this subsection to be in
the best interests of state employees in a region, the cabinet may award the
contract for that region to no more than two (2) carriers; and
(e) Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the Personnel Cabinet from including
other requirements or criteria in the request for proposal.
(21) Any fully insured health benefit plan or self-insured plan issued or renewed on or
after July 12, 2006, to public employees pursuant to this section which provides
coverage for services rendered by a physician or osteopath duly licensed under KRS
Chapter 311 that are within the scope of practice of an optometrist duly licensed
under the provisions of KRS Chapter 320 shall provide the same payment of
coverage to optometrists as allowed for those services rendered by physicians or
osteopaths.
(22) Any fully insured health benefit plan or self-insured plan issued or renewed to
public employees pursuant to this section shall comply with:
(a) KRS 304.12-237;
(b) KRS 304.17A-270 and 304.17A-525;
(c) KRS 304.17A-600 to 304.17A-633;
(d) KRS 205.593;
(e) KRS 304.17A-700 to 304.17A-730;
(f) KRS 304.14-135;
Page 10 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
(g) KRS 304.17A-580 and 304.17A-641;
(h) KRS 304.99-123;
(i) KRS 304.17A-138;
(j) KRS 304.17A-148;
(k) KRS 304.17A-163 and 304.17A-1631;
(l) KRS 304.17A-265;
(m) KRS 304.17A-261;
(n) KRS 304.17A-262;
(o) KRS 304.17A-145;
(p) KRS 304.17A-129;
(q) KRS 304.17A-133;
(r) KRS 304.17A-264; and
(s) Administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to statutes listed in this
subsection.
(23) (a) Any fully insured health benefit plan or self-insured plan issued or renewed to
public employees pursuant to this section shall provide a special enrollment
period to pregnant women who are eligible for coverage in accordance with
the requirements set forth in KRS 304.17-182.
(b) The Department of Employee Insurance shall, at or before the time a public
employee is initially offered the opportunity to enroll in the plan or coverage,
provide the employee a notice of the special enrollment rights under this
subsection.
Section 2. KRS 78.510 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 78.510 to 78.852, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "System" means the County Employees Retirement System created by KRS 78.510
to 78.852;
(2) "Board" means the board of trustees of the system as provided in KRS 78.782;
Page 11 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
(3) "County" means any county, or nonprofit organization created and governed by a
county, counties, or elected county officers, sheriff and his or her employees,
county clerk and his or her employees, circuit clerk and his or her deputies, former
circuit clerks or former circuit clerk deputies, or political subdivision or
instrumentality, including school boards, cities, charter county governments, urban-
county governments, consolidated local governments, or unified local governments
participating in the system by order appropriate to its governmental structure, as
provided in KRS 78.530, and if the board is willing to accept the agency,
organization, or corporation, the board being hereby granted the authority to
determine the eligibility of the agency to participate;
(4) "School board" means[:
(a) ] any board of education participating in the system by order appropriate to
its governmental structure, as provided in KRS 78.530, and if the board is
willing to accept the agency or corporation, the board being hereby granted
the authority to determine the eligibility of the agency to participate;[ or
(b) A public charter school as defined in KRS 160.1590 if the public charter
school satisfies the criteria set by the Internal Revenue Service to participate
in a governmental retirement plan;]
(5) "Examiner" means the medical examiners as provided in KRS 61.665;
(6) "Employee" means every regular full-time appointed or elective officer or
employee of a participating county and the coroner of a participating county,
whether or not he or she qualifies as a regular full-time officer. The term shall not
include persons engaged as independent contractors, seasonal, emergency,
temporary, and part-time workers. In case of any doubt, the board shall determine if
a person is an employee within the meaning of KRS 78.510 to 78.852;
(7) "Employer" means a county, as defined in subsection (3) of this section, the elected
officials of a county, or any authority of the county having the power to appoint or
Page 12 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
elect an employee to office or employment in the county;
(8) "Member" means any employee who is included in the membership of the system
or any former employee whose membership has not ceased under KRS 78.535;
(9) "Service" means the total of current service and prior service as defined in this
section;
(10) "Current service" means the number of years and months of employment as an
employee, on and after July 1, 1958, for which creditable compensation is paid and
employee contributions deducted, except as otherwise provided;
(11) "Prior service" means the number of years and completed months, expressed as a
fraction of a year, of employment as an employee, prior to July 1, 1958, for which
creditable compensation was paid. An employee shall be credited with one (1)
month of prior service only in those months he or she received compensation for at
least one hundred (100) hours of work. Twelve (12) months of current service in the
system shall be required to validate prior service;
(12) "Accumulated contributions" means the sum of all amounts deducted from the
compensation of a member and credited to his or her individual account in the
members' account, including employee contributions picked up after August 1,
1982, pursuant to KRS 78.610(4), together with interest credited, on the amounts,
and any other amounts the member shall have contributed thereto, including interest
credited thereon. "Accumulated contributions" shall not include employee
contributions that are deposited into accounts established pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec.
401(h) within the fund established in KRS 78.520, as prescribed by KRS
78.5536(3)(b);
(13) "Creditable compensation":
(a) Except as limited by paragraph (c) of this subsection, means all salary, wages,
and fees, including payments for compensatory time, paid to the employee as
a result of services performed for the employer or for time during which the
Page 13 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
member is on paid leave, which are includable on the member's federal form
W-2 wage and tax statement under the heading "wages, tips, other
compensation", including employee contributions picked up after August 1,
1982, pursuant to KRS 78.610(4). The creditable compensation of fee officers
who receive salary, fees, maintenance, or other perquisites as a result of their
official duties is the gross amount received decreased by the cost of salary
paid deputies and clerks and the cost of office supplies and other official
expenses;
(b) Includes:
1. Lump-sum bonuses, severance pay, or employer-provided payments for
purchase of service credit, which shall be averaged over the employee's
service with the system in which it is recorded if it is equal to or greater
than one thousand dollars ($1,000);
2. Cases where compensation includes maintenance and other perquisites,
but the board shall fix the value of that part of the compensation not paid
in money;
3. Lump-sum payments for creditable compensation paid as a result of an
order of a court of competent jurisdiction, the Personnel Board, or the
Kentucky Commission on Human Rights, or for any creditable
compensation paid in anticipation of settlement of an action before a
court of competent jurisdiction, the Personnel Board, or the Kentucky
Commission on Human Rights, including notices of violations of state
or federal wage and hour statutes or violations of state or federal
discrimination statutes, which shall be credited to the fiscal year during
which the wages were earned or should have been paid by the employer.
This subparagraph shall also include lump-sum payments for reinstated
wages pursuant to KRS 61.569, which shall be credited to the period
Page 14 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
during which the wages were earned or should have been paid by the
employer;
4. Amounts which are not includable in the member's gross income by
virtue of the member having taken a voluntary salary reduction provided
for under applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code; and
5. Elective amounts for qualified transportation fringes paid or made
available on or after January 1, 2001, for calendar years on or after
January 1, 2001, that are not includable in the gross income of the
employee by reason of 26 U.S.C. sec. 132(f)(4); and
(c) Excludes:
1. Living allowances, expense reimbursements, lump-sum payments for
accrued vacation leave, sick leave except as provided in KRS 78.616(5),
and other items determined by the board;
2. For employees who begin participating on or after September 1, 2008,
lump-sum payments for compensatory time;
3. Training incentive payments for city officers paid as set out in KRS
64.5277 to 64.5279;
4. For employees who begin participating on or after August 1, 2016,
nominal fees paid for services as a volunteer; and
5. Any salary or wages paid to an employee for services as a Kentucky
State Police school resource officer as defined by KRS 158.441;
(14) "Final compensation" means:
(a) For a member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, who is
employed in a nonhazardous position, the creditable compensation of the
member during the five (5) fiscal years he or she was paid at the highest
average monthly rate divided by the number of months of service credit
during that five (5) year period multiplied by twelve (12). The five (5) years
Page 15 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
may be fractional and need not be consecutive. If the number of months of
service credit during the five (5) year period is less than forty-eight (48), one
(1) or more additional fiscal years shall be used;
(b) For a member who is employed in a nonhazardous position, whose effective
retirement date is between August 1, 2001, and January 1, 2009, and whose
total service credit is at least twenty-seven (27) years and whose age and years
of service total at least seventy-five (75), final compensation means the
creditable compensation of the member during the three (3) fiscal years the
member was paid at the highest average monthly rate divided by the number
of months of service credit during that three (3) year period multiplied by
twelve (12). The three (3) years may be fractional and need not be
consecutive. If the number of months of service credit during the three (3)
year period is less than twenty-four (24), one (1) or more additional fiscal
years shall be used;
(c) For a member who begins participating before September 1, 2008, who is
employed in a hazardous position, as provided in KRS 78.5520, the creditable
compensation of the member during the three (3) fiscal years he or she was
paid at the highest average monthly rate divided by the number of months of
service credit during that three (3) year period multiplied by twelve (12). The
three (3) years may be fractional and need not be consecutive. If the number
of months of service credit during the three (3) year period is less than twenty-
four (24), one (1) or more additional fiscal years, which may contain less than
twelve (12) months of service credit, shall be used;
(d) For a member who begins participating on or after September 1, 2008, but
prior to January 1, 2014, who is employed in a nonhazardous position, the
creditable compensation of the member during the five (5) complete fiscal
years immediately preceding retirement divided by five (5). Each fiscal year
Page 16 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
used to determine final compensation must contain twelve (12) months of
service credit. If the member does not have five (5) complete fiscal years that
each contain twelve (12) months of service credit, then one (1) or more
additional fiscal years, which may contain less than twelve (12) months of
service credit, shall be added until the number of months in the final
compensation calculation is at least sixty (60) months; or
(e) For a member who begins participating on or after September 1, 2008, but
prior to January 1, 2014, who is employed in a hazardous position as provided
in KRS 78.5520, the creditable compensation of the member during the three
(3) complete fiscal years he or she was paid at the highest average monthly
rate divided by three (3). Each fiscal year used to determine final
compensation must contain twelve (12) months of service credit. If the
member does not have three (3) complete fiscal years that each contain twelve
(12) months of service credit, then one (1) or more additional fiscal years,
which may contain less than twelve (12) months of service credit, shall be
added until the number of months in the final compensation calculation is at
least thirty-six (36) months;
(15) "Final rate of pay" means the actual rate upon which earnings of an employee were
calculated during the twelve (12) month period immediately preceding the
member's effective retirement date, and shall include employee contributions
picked up after August 1, 1982, pursuant to KRS 78.610(4). The rate shall be
certified to the system by the employer and the following equivalents shall be used
to convert the rate to an annual rate: two thousand eighty (2,080) hours for eight (8)
hour workdays, one thousand nine hundred fifty (1,950) hours for seven and one-
half (7.5) hour workdays, two hundred sixty (260) days, fifty-two (52) weeks,
twelve (12) months, one (1) year;
(16) "Retirement allowance" means the retirement payments to which a member is
Page 17 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
entitled;
(17) "Actuarial equivalent" means a benefit of equal value when computed upon the
basis of the actuarial tables adopted by the board. In cases of disability retirement,
the options authorized by KRS 61.635 shall be computed by adding ten (10) years
to the age of the member, unless the member has chosen the Social Security
adjustment option as provided for in KRS 61.635(8), in which case the member's
actual age shall be used. For members who begin participating in the system prior
to January 1, 2014, no disability retirement option shall be less than the same option
computed under early retirement;
(18) "Normal retirement date", unless otherwise provided in KRS 78.510 to 78.852,
means:
(a) For a member with service in a nonhazardous position, the sixty-fifth birthday
of a member;
(b) For a member with service in a hazardous position who begins participating
before September 1, 2008, the first day of the month following a member's
fifty-fifth birthday; or
(c) For a member with service in a hazardous position who begins participating
on or after September 1, 2008, the first day of the month following a
member's sixtieth birthday;
(19) "Fiscal year" of the system means the twelve (12) months from July 1 through the
following June 30, which shall also be the plan year. The "fiscal year" shall be the
limitation year used to determine contribution and benefits limits as set out in 26
U.S.C. sec. 415;
(20) "Agency reporting official" means the person designated by the participating
employer who shall be responsible for forwarding all employer and employee
contributions and a record of the contributions to the system and for performing
other administrative duties pursuant to KRS 78.510 to 78.852;
Page 18 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
(21) "Regular full-time positions," as used in subsection (6) of this section, shall mean
all positions that average one hundred (100) or more hours per month, determined
by using the number of hours actually worked in a calendar or fiscal year, or eighty
(80) or more hours per month in the case of noncertified employees of school
boards, determined by using the number of hours actually worked in a calendar or
school year, unless otherwise specified, except:
(a) Seasonal positions, which although temporary in duration, are positions which
coincide in duration with a particular season or seasons of the year and that
may recur regularly from year to year, in which case the period of time shall
not exceed nine (9) months, except for employees of school boards, in which
case the period of time shall not exceed six (6) months;
(b) Emergency positions which are positions utilized by the employer during:
1. An emergency as determined by the employer for a period not
exceeding thirty (30) working days and are nonrenewable; or
2. A state of emergency declared by the President of the United States or
the Governor of the Commonwealth of Kentucky that are created or
filled specifically for addressing the employer's needs during and as a
result of the declared emergency;
(c) Temporary positions that are positions of employment with a participating
agency for a period of time not to exceed twelve (12) months and not
renewable;
(d) Probationary positions which are positions of employment with a participating
employer that do not exceed twelve (12) months and that are used uniformly
by the participating agency on new employees who would otherwise be
eligible for participation in the system. Probationary positions shall not be
renewable by the participating employer for the same employee, unless the
employee has not been employed with the participating employer for a period
Page 19 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
of at least twelve (12) months; or
(e) Part-time positions that are positions that may be permanent in duration, but
that require less than a calendar or fiscal year average of one hundred (100)
hours of work per month, determined by using the number of months actually
worked within a calendar or fiscal year, in the performance of duty, except in
case of noncertified employees of school boards, the school term average shall
be eighty (80) hours of work per month, determined by using the number of
months actually worked in a calendar or school year, in the performance of
duty;
(22) "Alternate participation plan" means a method of participation in the system as
provided for by KRS 78.530(3);
(23) "Retired member" means any former member receiving a retirement allowance or
any former member who has on file at the retirement office the necessary
documents for retirement benefits and is no longer contributing to the system;
(24) "Current rate of pay" means the member's actual hourly, daily, weekly, biweekly,
monthly, or yearly rate of pay converted to an annual rate as defined in final rate of
pay. The rate shall be certified by the employer;
(25) "Beneficiary" means the person, persons, estate, trust, or trustee designated by the
member in accordance with KRS 61.542 or 61.705 to receive any available benefits
in the event of the member's death. As used in KRS 78.5536, beneficiary shall not
mean an estate, trust, or trustee;
(26) "Recipient" means the retired member, the person or persons designated as
beneficiary by the member and drawing a retirement allowance as a result of the
member's death, or a dependent child drawing a retirement allowance. An alternate
payee of a qualified domestic relations order shall not be considered a recipient,
except for purposes of KRS 61.623;
(27) "Person" means a natural person;
Page 20 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
(28) "School term or year" means the twelve (12) months from July 1 through the
following June 30;
(29) "Retirement office" means the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority office building
in Frankfort, unless otherwise designated by the Kentucky Public Pensions
Authority;
(30) "Vested" for purposes of determining eligibility for purchasing service credit under
KRS 61.552 means the employee has at least forty-eight (48) months of service if
age sixty-five (65) or older or at least sixty (60) months of service if under the age
of sixty-five (65). For purposes of this subsection, "service" means service in the
systems administered by the Kentucky Retirement Systems and County Employees
Retirement System;
(31) "Participating" means an employee is currently earning service credit in the system
as provided in KRS 78.615;
(32) "Month" means a calendar month;
(33) "Membership date" means the date upon which the member began participating in
the system as provided in KRS 78.615;
(34) "Participant" means a member, as defined by subsection (8) of this section, or a
retired member, as defined by subsection (23) of this section;
(35) "Qualified domestic relations order" means any judgment, decree, or order,
including approval of a property settlement agreement, that:
(a) Is issued by a court or administrative agency; and
(b) Relates to the provision of child support, alimony payments, or marital
property rights to an alternate payee;
(36) "Alternate payee" means a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a
participant, who is designated to be paid retirement benefits in a qualified domestic
relations order;
(37) "Accumulated employer credit" means the employer pay credit deposited to the
Page 21 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
member's account and interest credited on such amounts as provided by KRS
78.5512 and 78.5516;
(38) "Accumulated account balance" means:
(a) For members who began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2014,
the member's accumulated contributions; or
(b) For members who began participating in the system on or after January 1,
2014, in the hybrid cash balance plan as provided by KRS 78.5512 and
78.5516, the combined sum of the member's accumulated contributions and
the member's accumulated employer credit;
(39) "Volunteer" means an individual who:
(a) Freely and without pressure or coercion performs hours of service for an
employer participating in one (1) of the systems administered by Kentucky
Retirement Systems or the County Employees Retirement System without
receipt of compensation for services rendered, except for reimbursement of
actual expenses, payment of a nominal fee to offset the costs of performing
the voluntary services, or both; and
(b) If a retired member, does not become an employee, leased employee, or
independent contractor of the employer for which he or she is performing
volunteer services for a period of at least twelve (12) months following the
retired member's most recent retirement date;
(40) "Nominal fee" means compensation earned for services as a volunteer that does not
exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per month with each participating employer.
Compensation earned for services as a volunteer from more than one (1)
participating employer during a month shall not be aggregated to determine whether
the compensation exceeds the five hundred dollars ($500) per month maximum
provided by this subsection;
(41) "Nonhazardous position" means a position that does not meet the requirements of
Page 22 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
KRS 78.5520 or has not been approved by the board as a hazardous position;
(42) "Hazardous position" means a position that meets the requirements of KRS 78.5520
and has been approved by the board as hazardous;
(43) "Level-percentage-of-payroll amortization method" means a method of determining
the annual amortization payment on the unfunded actuarial accrued liability as
expressed as a percentage of payroll over a set period of years. Under this method,
the percentage of payroll shall be projected to remain constant for all years
remaining in the set period and the unfunded actuarially accrued liability shall be
projected to be fully amortized at the conclusion of the set period;
(44) "Increment" means twelve (12) months of service credit which are purchased. The
twelve (12) months need not be consecutive. The final increment may be less than
twelve (12) months;
(45) "Last day of paid employment" means the last date employer and employee
contributions are required to be reported in accordance with KRS 16.543, 61.543, or
78.615 to the retirement office in order for the employee to receive current service
credit for the month. Last day of paid employment does not mean a date the
employee receives payment for accrued leave, whether by lump sum or otherwise,
if that date occurs twenty-four (24) or more months after previous contributions;
(46) "Objective medical evidence" means reports of examinations or treatments; medical
signs which are anatomical, physiological, or psychological abnormalities that can
be observed; psychiatric signs which are medically demonstrable phenomena
indicating specific abnormalities of behavior, affect, thought, memory, orientation,
or contact with reality; or laboratory findings which are anatomical, physiological,
or psychological phenomena that can be shown by medically acceptable laboratory
diagnostic techniques, including but not limited to chemical tests,
electrocardiograms, electroencephalograms, X-rays, and psychological tests;
(47) "Hazardous disability" as used in KRS 78.510 to 78.852 means a disability which
Page 23 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
results in an employee's total incapacity to continue as an employee in a hazardous
position, but the employee is not necessarily deemed to be totally and permanently
disabled to engage in other occupations for remuneration or profit;
(48) "Act in line of duty" means, for employees in hazardous positions under KRS
78.5520:
(a) A single act occurring which was required in the performance of the principal
duties of the hazardous position as defined by the job description; or
(b) A single act of violence committed against the employee that is found to be
related to his or her job duties, whether or not it occurs at his or her job site;
(49) "Dependent child" means a child in the womb and a natural or legally adopted child
of the member who has neither attained age eighteen (18) nor married or who is an
unmarried full-time student who has not attained age twenty-two (22). Solely in the
case of a member who dies as a direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in
this section, dies as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621,
becomes totally and permanently disabled as a direct result of an act in the line of
duty as defined in this section, or becomes disabled as a result of a duty-related
injury as defined in KRS 61.621 and is eligible for the benefits provided by KRS
61.621(5)(a), "dependent child" also means a naturally or legally adopted disabled
child of the member, regardless of the child's age, if the child has been determined
to be eligible for federal Social Security disability benefits or is being claimed as a
qualifying child for tax purposes due to the child's total and permanent disability;
(50) "Normal retirement age" means the age at which the member meets the
requirements for his or her normal retirement date as provided by subsection (18) of
this section;
(51) "Disability retirement date" means the first day of the month following the last day
of paid employment;
(52) "Monthly average pay" means:
Page 24 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
(a) In the case of a member who dies as a direct result of an act in line of duty as
defined in KRS 16.505 or who dies as a result of a duty-related injury as
defined in KRS 61.621, the higher of the member's monthly final rate of pay
or the average monthly creditable compensation earned by the deceased
member during his or her last twelve (12) months of employment; or
(b) In the case where a member becomes totally and permanently disabled as a
direct result of an act in line of duty as defined in KRS 16.505 or becomes
disabled as a result of a duty-related injury as defined in KRS 61.621 and is
eligible for the benefits provided by KRS 61.621(5)(a), the higher of the
member's monthly final rate of pay or the average monthly creditable
compensation earned by the disabled member during his or her last twelve
(12) months of employment prior to the date the act in line of duty or duty-
related injury occurred;
(53) "Authority" means the Kentucky Public Pensions Authority as provided by KRS
61.505;
(54) "Executive director" means the executive director of the Kentucky Public Pensions
Authority; and
(55) "Gainful employment" means work in any capacity that is or may be performed
with regularity and is or may be usually done for pay, whether pay is received or
not received, including seasonal, volunteer, part-time, and on-call work.
Section 3. KRS 156.095 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Department of Education shall establish, direct, and maintain a
statewide program of professional development to improve instruction in the public
schools.
(2) Each local school district superintendent shall appoint a certified school employee
to fulfill the role and responsibilities of a professional development coordinator
who shall disseminate professional development information to schools and
Page 25 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
personnel. Upon request by a school council or any employees of the district, the
coordinator shall provide technical assistance to the council or the personnel that
may include assisting with needs assessments, analyzing school data, planning and
evaluation assistance, organizing districtwide programs requested by school
councils or groups of teachers, or other coordination activities.
(a) The manner of appointment, qualifications, and other duties of the
professional development coordinator shall be established by Kentucky Board
of Education through promulgation of administrative regulations.
(b) The local district professional development coordinator shall participate in the
Kentucky Department of Education annual training program for local school
district professional development coordinators. The training program may
include, but not be limited to, the demonstration of various approaches to
needs assessment and planning; strategies for implementing long-term,
school-based professional development; strategies for strengthening teachers'
roles in the planning, development, and evaluation of professional
development; and demonstrations of model professional development
programs. The training shall include information about teacher learning
opportunities relating to the core content standards. The Kentucky Department
of Education shall regularly collect and distribute this information.
(3) The Kentucky Department of Education shall provide or facilitate optional,
professional development programs for certified personnel throughout the
Commonwealth that are based on the statewide needs of teachers, administrators,
and other education personnel. Programs may include classified staff and parents
when appropriate. Programs offered or facilitated by the department shall be at
locations and times convenient to local school personnel and shall be made
accessible through the use of technology when appropriate. They shall include
programs that: address the goals for Kentucky schools as stated in KRS 158.6451,
Page 26 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
including reducing the achievement gaps as determined by an equity analysis of the
disaggregated student performance data from the state assessment program
developed under KRS 158.6453; engage educators in effective learning processes
and foster collegiality and collaboration; and provide support for staff to
incorporate newly acquired skills into their work through practicing the skills,
gathering information about the results, and reflecting on their efforts. Professional
development programs shall be made available to teachers based on their needs
which shall include but not be limited to the following areas:
(a) Strategies to reduce the achievement gaps among various groups of students
and to provide continuous progress;
(b) Curriculum content and methods of instruction for each content area,
including differentiated instruction;
(c) School-based decision making;
(d) Assessment literacy;
(e) Integration of performance-based student assessment into daily classroom
instruction;
(f) Nongraded primary programs;
(g) Research-based instructional practices;
(h) Instructional uses of technology;
(i) Curriculum design to serve the needs of students with diverse learning styles
and skills and of students of diverse cultures;
(j) Instruction in reading, including phonics, phonemic awareness,
comprehension, fluency, and vocabulary;
(k) Educational leadership; and
(l) Strategies to incorporate character education throughout the curriculum.
(4) The department shall assist school personnel in assessing the impact of professional
development on their instructional practices and student learning.
Page 27 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
(5) The department shall assist districts and school councils with the development of
long-term school and district improvement plans that include multiple strategies for
professional development based on the assessment of needs at the school level.
(a) Professional development strategies may include but are not limited to
participation in subject matter academies, teacher networks, training institutes,
workshops, seminars, and study groups; collegial planning; action research;
mentoring programs; appropriate university courses; and other forms of
professional development.
(b) In planning the use of the four (4) days for professional development under
KRS 158.070, school councils and districts shall give priority to programs that
increase teachers' understanding of curriculum content and methods of
instruction appropriate for each content area based on individual school plans.
The district may use up to one (1) day to provide district-wide training and
training that is mandated by state or federal law. Only those employees
identified in the mandate or affected by the mandate shall be required to
attend the training.
(c) State funds allocated for professional development shall be used to support
professional development initiatives that are consistent with local school
improvement and professional development plans and teachers' individual
growth plans. The funds may be used throughout the year for all staff,
including classified and certified staff and parents on school councils or
committees. A portion of the funds allocated to each school council under
KRS 160.345 may be used to prepare or enhance the teachers' knowledge and
teaching practices related to the content and subject matter that are required
for their specific classroom assignments.
(6) (a) The Kentucky Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall post on its web
page evidence-based suicide prevention awareness information, to include
Page 28 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
recognizing the warning signs of a suicide crisis. The web page shall include
information related to suicide prevention training opportunities offered by the
cabinet or an agency recognized by the cabinet as a training provider.
(b) Every public school [and public charter school ]shall provide two (2)
evidence-based suicide prevention awareness lessons each school year, the
first by September 15 and the second by January 15, either in person, by live
streaming, or via a video recording to all students in grades six (6) through
twelve (12). Every public school shall provide an opportunity for any student
absent on the day the evidence-based suicide prevention awareness lesson was
initially presented to receive the lesson at a later time. The information may
be obtained from the Cabinet for Health and Family Services or from a
commercially developed suicide prevention training program.
(c) 1. Each school year, a minimum of one (1) hour of high-quality evidence-
based suicide prevention training, including risk factors, warning signs,
protective factors, response procedures, referral, postvention, and the
recognition of signs and symptoms of possible mental illness, shall be
required for all school district employees with job duties requiring direct
contact with students in grades four (4) through twelve (12). The
training shall be provided either in person, by live streaming, or via a
video recording and may be included in the four (4) days of professional
development under KRS 158.070. As used in this subparagraph,
"postvention" means a series of planned supports and interventions with
persons affected by a suicide for the purpose of facilitating the grieving
or adjustment process, stabilizing the environment, reducing the risk of
negative behaviors, and limiting the risk of further suicides through
contagion.
2. When a staff member subject to the training under subparagraph 1. of
Page 29 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
this paragraph is initially hired during a school year in which the
training is not required, the local district shall provide suicide prevention
materials to the staff member for review.
[(d) The requirements of paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection shall apply to
public charter schools as a health and safety requirement under KRS
160.1592(1).]
(7) (a) By November 1 of each year, a minimum of one (1) hour of training on how
to respond to an active shooter situation shall be required for all school district
employees with job duties requiring direct contact with students. The training
shall be provided either in person, by live streaming, or via a video recording
prepared by the Kentucky Department of Criminal Justice Training in
collaboration with the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council, the Kentucky
Department of Education, and the Center for School Safety and may be
included in the four (4) days of professional development under KRS
158.070.
(b) When a staff member subject to the training requirements of this subsection is
initially hired after the training has been provided for the school year, the
local district shall provide materials on how to respond to an active shooter
situation.
[(c) The requirements of this subsection shall also apply to public charter schools
as a health and safety requirement under KRS 160.1592(1).]
(8) (a) The Kentucky Department of Education shall develop and maintain a list of
approved comprehensive evidence-informed trainings on child abuse and
neglect prevention, recognition, and reporting that encompass child physical,
sexual, and emotional abuse and neglect.
(b) The trainings shall be web-based or in-person and cover, at a minimum, the
following topics:
Page 30 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
1. Recognizing child physical, sexual, and emotional abuse and neglect;
2. Reporting suspected child abuse and neglect in Kentucky as required by
KRS 620.030 and the appropriate documentation;
3. Responding to the child; and
4. Understanding the response of child protective services.
(c) The trainings shall include a questionnaire or other basic assessment tool upon
completion to document basic knowledge of training components.
(d) Each local board of education shall adopt one (1) or more trainings from the
list approved by the Department of Education to be implemented by schools.
(e) All school administrators, certified personnel, office staff, instructional
assistants, and coaches and extracurricular sponsors who are employed by the
school district shall complete the implemented training or trainings within
ninety (90) days of being hired and then every two (2) years after.
(f) Every public school shall prominently display the statewide child abuse
hotline number administered by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services,
the National Human Trafficking Reporting Hotline number administered by
the United States Department for Health and Human Services, and the Safe
Haven Baby Boxes Crisis Line number administered by the Safe Haven Baby
Boxes national organization or any equivalent successor entity.
[(g) The requirements of this subsection shall also apply to public charter schools
as a health and safety requirement under KRS 160.1592(1).]
(9) The Department of Education shall establish an electronic consumer bulletin board
that posts information regarding professional development providers and programs
as a service to school district central office personnel, school councils, teachers, and
administrators. Participation on the electronic consumer bulletin board shall be
voluntary for professional development providers or vendors, but shall include all
programs sponsored by the department. Participants shall provide the following
Page 31 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
information: program title; name of provider or vendor; qualifications of the
presenters or instructors; objectives of the program; program length; services
provided, including follow-up support; costs for participation and costs of
materials; names of previous users of the program, addresses, and telephone
numbers; and arrangements required. Posting information on the bulletin board by
the department shall not be viewed as an endorsement of the quality of any specific
provider or program.
(10) The Department of Education shall provide training to address the characteristics
and instructional needs of students at risk of school failure and most likely to drop
out of school. The training shall be developed to meet the specific needs of all
certified and classified personnel depending on their relationship with these
students. The training for instructional personnel shall be designed to provide and
enhance skills of personnel to:
(a) Identify at-risk students early in elementary schools as well as at-risk and
potential dropouts in the middle and high schools;
(b) Plan specific instructional strategies to teach at-risk students;
(c) Improve the academic achievement of students at risk of school failure by
providing individualized and extra instructional support to increase
expectations for targeted students;
(d) Involve parents as partners in ways to help their children and to improve their
children's academic progress; and
(e) Significantly reduce the dropout rate of all students.
(11) The department shall establish teacher academies to the extent funding is available
in cooperation with postsecondary education institutions for elementary, middle
school, and high school faculty in core disciplines, utilizing facilities and faculty
from universities and colleges, local school districts, and other appropriate agencies
throughout the state. Priority for participation shall be given to those teachers who
Page 32 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
are teaching core discipline courses for which they do not have a major or minor or
the equivalent. Participation of teachers shall be voluntary.
(12) The department shall annually provide to the oversight council established in KRS
15A.063, the information received from local schools pursuant to KRS 158.449.
Section 4. KRS 157.063 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that:
(a) During the first five (5) years of life, children experience rapid learning and
development that have effects that endure their lifetimes;
(b) A key milestone in children's development is their transition into and
readiness for kindergarten;
(c) High quality early childhood literacy programs can significantly improve a
child's readiness for kindergarten and future academic success;
(d) Children in Kentucky would benefit from access to varied and effective early
literacy services; and
(e) Developing new and innovative services for the children of the
Commonwealth can expand access to early literacy services and improve
kindergarten readiness.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) "Child-care center" has the same meaning as in KRS 199.894;
(b) "Contractor" means the educational technology provider selected pursuant to
subsection (4) of this section;
(c) "Department" means the Kentucky Department of Education; and
(d) "Eligible child" means a child who is four (4) or five (5) years old and is not
currently enrolled in kindergarten in a public school district, but is eligible to
enroll during the following school year.
(3) The Adaptive Kindergarten Readiness Pilot Project is hereby established to provide
preschool children with access to educational technology programs that use family
Page 33 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
engagement to improve kindergarten readiness. The pilot project shall:
(a) During the 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 school years, provide a cohort of
eligible children during each school year with access to an educational
technology program that:
1. Utilizes family engagement to deliver age-appropriate instruction in
reading that may be implemented in homes or in child-care centers;
2. Offers optional instruction in mathematics and science;
3. Aligns with relevant state standards for preschool under KRS 157.3175;
4. Assists with the objectives of the Head Start Act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 9801 et
seq.;
5. Assists children with disabilities in preparing for kindergarten; and
6. Meets the benchmarks for evidence-based programs established by the
United States Department of Education;
(b) Operate under the oversight of the Kentucky Department of Education;
(c) Solicit families to encourage their eligible child's participation in the pilot
project through public information campaigns, outreach programs, and
referrals from other educational entities that are partially focused on
communities and areas of the state encountering persistent poverty;
(d) Reserve forty percent (40%) of a cohort's membership for eligible students
with a household income of no more than two hundred percent (200%) of the
federal poverty level. However, if a seat reserved under this paragraph
remains vacant for more than two (2) months, the seat in that cohort may be
given to any eligible child. The pilot project shall enroll eligible children as
students in both the reserved and unreserved membership in the order the
completed applications were submitted. The maximum enrollment for each
cohort shall be established by the department and provider based on the funds
available;
Page 34 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
(e) Use:
1. A multisensory reading tutoring program; and
2. A validated adaptive reading test that does not require the presence of
trained adults to administer and that has been demonstrated as an
accurate indicator of a child's reading readiness; and
(f) As needed and at no cost for the student's family, for the duration of the
student's participation in the pilot project, provide a student with a household
income of no more than four hundred percent (400%) of the federal poverty
level with:
1. A computer or tablet; and
2. Access to internet service.
(4) The Kentucky Department of Education shall select a provider to implement the
pilot project under the department's oversight. In evaluating provider applicants, the
department shall require an applicant to have:
(a) At least three (3) years of experience in implementing similar services;
(b) Conducted a randomized controlled trial or other external evaluation that
support the efficacy of the educational technology program the provider
implements; and
(c) Capabilities to:
1. Partner with preschool, head start, and child-care centers to serve
participating students;
2. Communicate with parents and other education professionals involved
in the pilot project;
3. Update the instructional software as needed;
4. Validate user access;
5. Collect user data;
6. Store research data;
Page 35 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
7. Produce reports for parents, schools, the department, and the Legislative
Research Commission; and
8. Comply with state and federal education and digital privacy laws.
(5) The selected provider shall:
(a) Develop a recruitment plan to solicit families to participate in the pilot
project;
(b) Implement the pilot project in compliance with subsection (3) of this section;
(c) Provide administrative and technical support to students, families, and any
other involved education professionals for the installation and operation of the
instructional software;
(d) Seek the advice and expertise of local stakeholders, such as public and private
early childhood education professionals, the department, local school board
members, kindergarten teachers, and parents, on the implementation of the
pilot project in areas such as:
1. Soliciting families to participate in the pilot project;
2. Providing training to families and education professionals; and
3. Motivating families to regularly use the instructional software; and
(e) At the conclusion of each school year, report any data required by the
department to conduct an evaluation of the pilot project's effectiveness.
(6) By December 1, 2025, the department shall submit a report to the Legislative
Research Commission for referral to the appropriate Interim Joint Committee on
Education, that contains the following:
(a) The extent to which the pilot project is accomplishing the objectives identified
in this section;
(b) The number of families:
1. Participating in the project;
2. Who have received technology devices or internet service in the project;
Page 36 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
and
3. Who have household incomes of no more than two hundred percent
(200%) of the federal poverty level or who reside in areas of persistent
poverty;
(c) The number of private and public educational entities the provider has
partnered with during the pilot project;
(d) The frequency of use of the instructional software;
(e) Obstacles encountered with software usage, hardware, internet access, or
providing technical assistance; and
(f) Student performance on any kindergarten entry or exit assessments conducted
by school districts[ or public charter schools] that compare students have
participated in the project and students who have not.
(7) The Kentucky Department of Education shall implement this section to the extent
that federal funds are available.
Section 5. KRS 158.038 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [Beginning August 1, 2020, ]Any student identification badge issued to a student in
grades six (6) through twelve (12) by a public school shall contain the contact
information for:
(a) A national domestic violence hotline;
(b) A national sexual assault hotline; and
(c) A national suicide prevention hotline.
(2) [The requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall apply to public charter
schools as a health and safety requirement under KRS 160.1592(1).
(3) By July 20, 2020, ]The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall publish
recommendations for at least one (1) national hotline accessible twenty-four (24)
hours a day, seven (7) days a week, and three hundred sixty-five (365) days a year
that specializes in each of the hotline categories required by subsection (1) of this
Page 37 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
section.
Section 6. KRS 158.189 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Biological sex" means the physical condition of being male or female, which
is determined by a person's chromosomes, and is identified at birth by a
person's anatomy; and
(b) "School" means a school under the control of a local board of education[ or a
charter school board of directors].
(2) The General Assembly finds that:
(a) School personnel have a duty to protect the dignity, health, welfare, and
privacy rights of students in their care;
(b) Children and young adults have natural and normal concerns about privacy
while in various states of undress, and most wish for members of the opposite
biological sex not to be present in those circumstances;
(c) Allowing students to use restrooms, locker rooms, or shower rooms that are
reserved for students of a different biological sex:
1. Will create a significant potential for disruption of school activities and
unsafe conditions; and
2. Will create potential embarrassment, shame, and psychological injury to
students;
(d) Parents have a reasonable expectation that schools will not allow minor
children to be viewed in various states of undress by members of the opposite
biological sex, nor allow minor children to view members of the opposite sex
in various states of undress; and
(e) Schools have a duty to respect and protect the privacy rights of students,
including the right not to be compelled to undress or be unclothed in the
presence of members of the opposite biological sex.
Page 38 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
(3) Each local board of education[ or charter school board of directors] shall, after
allowing public comment on the issue at an open meeting, adopt policies necessary
to protect the privacy rights outlined in subsection (2) of this section and enforce
this subsection. Those policies shall, at a minimum, not allow students to use
restrooms, locker rooms, or shower rooms that are reserved for students of a
different biological sex.
(4) (a) A student who asserts to school officials that his or her gender is different
from his or her biological sex and whose parent or legal guardian provides
written consent to school officials shall be provided with the best available
accommodation, but that accommodation shall not include the use of school
restrooms, locker rooms, or shower rooms designated for use by students of
the opposite biological sex while students of the opposite biological sex are
present or could be present.
(b) Acceptable accommodations may include but are not limited to access to
single-stall restrooms or controlled use of faculty bathrooms, locker rooms, or
shower rooms.
Section 7. KRS 158.196 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A public school[ or public charter school] shall provide instruction and instructional
materials that are aligned with the social studies academic standards adopted in
accordance with KRS 158.6453 and consistent with the following concepts:
(a) All individuals are created equal;
(b) Americans are entitled to equal protection under the law;
(c) An individual deserves to be treated on the basis of the individual's character;
(d) An individual, by virtue of the individual's race or sex, does not bear
responsibility for actions committed by other members of the same race or
sex;
(e) The understanding that the institution of slavery and post-Civil War laws
Page 39 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
enforcing racial segregation and discrimination were contrary to the
fundamental American promise of life, liberty, and the pursuit of happiness,
as expressed in the Declaration of Independence, but that defining racial
disparities solely on the legacy of this institution is destructive to the
unification of our nation;
(f) The future of America's success is dependent upon cooperation among all its
citizens;
(g) Personal agency and the understanding that, regardless of one's circumstances,
an American has the ability to succeed when he or she is given sufficient
opportunity and is committed to seizing that opportunity through hard work,
pursuit of education, and good citizenship; and
(h) The significant value of the American principles of equality, freedom,
inalienable rights, respect for individual rights, liberty, and the consent of the
governed.
(2) Nothing in subsection (1) of this section shall be construed to restrict a public
school[ or public charter school] from providing instruction or using instructional
materials that include:
(a) The history of an ethnic group, as described in textbooks and instructional
materials adopted by a school district;
(b) The discussion of controversial aspects of history; or
(c) The instruction and instructional materials on the historical oppression of a
particular group of people.
(3) (a) Notwithstanding the every six (6) year schedule set forth in KRS
158.6453(2)(a), no later than July 1, 2023, the Kentucky Department of
Education shall incorporate fundamental American documents and speeches
into the grade-level appropriate middle and high school social studies
academic standards and align corresponding assessments, including but not
Page 40 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
limited to:
1. The Mayflower Compact;
2. The Declaration of Independence;
3. The Constitution of the United States;
4. The Federalist No. 1 (Alexander Hamilton);
5. The Federalist Nos. 10 and 51 (James Madison);
6. The June 8, 1789, speech on amendments to the Constitution of the
United States by James Madison;
7. The first ten (10) amendments to the Constitution of the United States,
also known as the Bill of Rights;
8. The 1796 Farewell Address by George Washington;
9. The United States Supreme Court opinion in Marbury v. Madison, 5
U.S. 137 (1803);
10. The Monroe Doctrine by James Monroe;
11. What to the Slave is the Fourth of July? speech by Frederick Douglass;
12. The United States Supreme Court opinion in Dred Scott v. Sandford, 60
U.S. 393 (1857);
13. Final Emancipation Proclamation by Abraham Lincoln;
14. The Gettysburg Address by Abraham Lincoln;
15. Declaration of Rights of the Women of the United States by Susan B.
Anthony, Matilda Joslyn Gage, and Elizabeth Cady Stanton;
16. The September 18, 1895, Atlanta Exposition Address by Booker T.
Washington;
17. Of Booker T. Washington and Others by W.E.B. Du Bois;
18. The United States Supreme Court opinion in Plessy v. Ferguson, 163
U.S. 537 (1896);
19. The August 31, 1910, New Nationalism speech by Theodore Roosevelt;
Page 41 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
20. The January 11, 1944, State of the Union Address by Franklin D.
Roosevelt;
21. The United States Supreme Court opinions in Brown v. Board of
Education of Topeka, 347 U.S. 483 (1954) and Brown v. Board of
Education of Topeka, 349 U.S. 294 (1955);
22. Letter from Birmingham Jail by Martin Luther King, Jr.;
23. The August 28, 1963, I Have a Dream speech by Martin Luther King,
Jr.; and
24. A Time for Choosing by Ronald Reagan.
(b) This revision shall not delay or otherwise impact the existing schedule as set
forth in KRS 158.6453(2).
Section 8. KRS 158.305 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Aphasia" means a condition characterized by either partial or total loss of the
ability to communicate verbally or through written words. A person with
aphasia may have difficulty speaking, reading, writing, recognizing the names
of objects, or understanding what other people have said. The condition may
be temporary or permanent and does not include speech problems caused by
loss of muscle control;
(b) "Dyscalculia" means the inability to understand the meaning of numbers, the
basic operations of addition and subtraction, the complex operations of
multiplication and division, or to apply math principles to solve practical or
abstract problems;
(c) "Dysgraphia" means difficulty in automatically remembering and mastering
the sequence of muscle motor movements needed to accurately write letters or
numbers;
(d) "Dyslexia" has the same meaning as in KRS 158.307;
Page 42 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
(e) "Enrichment program" means accelerated intervention within the school day
or outside of the school day or school calendar led by individuals most
qualified to provide the intervention that includes evidence-based reading
instructional programming related to reading instruction in the areas of
phonemic awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and comprehension, and
other instructional strategies aligned to reading and writing standards required
by KRS 158.6453 and outlined in administrative regulation promulgated by
the Kentucky Board of Education;
(f) "Evidence-based" has the same meaning as in 20 U.S.C. sec. 7801(21);
(g) "Phonemic awareness" has the same meaning as in KRS 158.307;
(h) "Reading diagnostic assessment" has the same meaning as in KRS 158.792;
(i) "Reading improvement plan" means an accelerated intervention plan for a
student in kindergarten through grade four (4) that is developed to increase a
student's rate of progress toward proficient performance in reading that is
identified as necessary based on the student's results on an approved reading
diagnostic assessment. This plan should be developed in collaboration and
accordance with any existing program services plan, individualized education
program, or Section 504 Plan unless the program services plan, individualized
education program, or Section 504 Plan already addresses improving reading;
(j) "Reading improvement team" means a team that develops and oversees the
progress of a reading improvement plan and includes:
1. The parent or guardian of the student that is the subject of the reading
improvement plan;
2. No less than one (1) regular education teacher of the student to provide
information about the general curriculum for same-aged peers;
3. A representative of the local education agency who is knowledgeable
about the reading curriculum and the availability of the evidence-based
Page 43 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
literacy resources of the local education agency; and
4. Any specialized certified school employees for students receiving
language instruction educational programming or special education
services; and
(k) "Universal screener" means a process of providing a brief assessment to all
students within a grade level to assess the students' performance on the
essential components of reading.
(2) Notwithstanding any other statute or administrative regulation to the contrary, the
Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations to further
define a multitiered system of supports for district-wide use of a system for students
in kindergarten through grade three (3), that includes a tiered continuum of
interventions with varying levels of intensity and duration and which connects
general, compensatory, and special education programs to provide interventions
implemented with fidelity to evidence-based research and matched to individual
student strengths and needs. At a minimum, evidence of implementation shall be
submitted by the district to the department by October 1 of each year and shall
include but not be limited to the activities required under KRS 158.649.
(3) The Department of Education shall provide technical assistance and training, if
requested by a local district, to assist in the implementation of the district-wide,
multitiered system of supports as a means to identify and assist any student
experiencing difficulty in reading, writing, mathematics, or behavior and to
determine appropriate instructional modifications needed by advanced learners to
make continuous progress.
(4) The technical assistance and training shall be designed to improve:
(a) The use of specific screening processes and programs to identify student
strengths and needs;
(b) The use of screening data for designing instructional interventions;
Page 44 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
(c) The use of multisensory instructional strategies and other interventions
validated for effectiveness by evidence-based research;
(d) Progress monitoring of student performance; and
(e) Accelerated, intensive, direct instruction that addresses students' individual
differences, including advanced learners, and enables students that are
experiencing difficulty to catch up with typically performing peers.
(5) (a) [By January 1, 2023, ]Each superintendent[ or public charter school board of
directors] shall select:
1. At least one (1) universal screener for reading that is determined by the
department to be reliable and valid to be administered to all students in
kindergarten through grade three (3); and
2. At least one (1) reading diagnostic assessment for reading that is
determined by the department to be reliable and valid to be administered
as part of a multitiered system of supports for students in kindergarten
through grade three (3).
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 158.6453(19) and 160.345, each superintendent[ or
public charter school board] shall adopt a common comprehensive reading
program that is determined by the department to be reliable, valid, and aligned
to reading and writing standards required by KRS 158.6453 and outlined in
administrative regulation promulgated by the Kentucky Board of Education
for kindergarten through grade three (3) for all schools or a subset of schools,
with consultation of all affected elementary school councils.
(c) All teachers of students in kindergarten through grade three (3)[, including
public charter school teachers,] shall be trained on any reading diagnostic
assessment and universal screener selected by the superintendent[ or public
charter school board] prior to administration of the assessment. The training
shall address:
Page 45 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
1. How to properly administer the reading diagnostic assessment;
2. How to interpret the results of the reading diagnostic assessment to
identify students needing interventions;
3. How to use the assessment results to design instruction and
interventions;
4. The use of the assessment to monitor the progress of student
performance; and
5. The use of accelerated, intensive, and direct instruction that addresses
students' individual differences and enables students to achieve
proficiency in reading, including but not limited to daily, one-on-one
instruction.
(6) [Beginning with the 2023-2024 school year, ]A universal screener determined by
the Department of Education to be reliable and valid shall be:
(a) Given in the first forty-five (45) days of the school year for all kindergarten
students at a public school[ or public charter school]; and
(b) Given in the first thirty (30) days of the school year for grades one (1) through
three (3) at a public school[ or public charter school].
(7) A reading improvement plan shall be developed and implemented by a reading
improvement team for any student in kindergarten through grade three (3) identified
as needing accelerated interventions to progress toward proficient performance in
reading. The reading improvement plan shall require:
(a) Intensive intervention that includes effective instructional strategies and
appropriate instructional materials necessary to help the student make
accelerated progress toward proficient performance in reading and become
ready for the next grade, including but not limited to daily, one-on-one
instruction with students the most in need provided by certified teachers
specifically trained to provide one-on-one instruction;
Page 46 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
(b) A school to provide a written quarterly progress report containing the
information required by paragraph (a) of this subsection to a parent or
guardian of any student subject to a reading improvement plan. The written
quarterly progress report for the reading improvement plan may be included
in the school's existing quarterly progress report; and
(c) Individual placement decisions for children who are eligible for special
education and related services to be determined by the appropriate admissions
and release committee in accordance with administrative regulations
promulgated by the Kentucky Board of Education.
(8) [Beginning in the 2023-2024 school year, ]If a student's rate of progress toward
proficient performance in reading needs accelerated interventions as demonstrated
by the results of an approved reading diagnostic assessment, the local school district
shall provide:
(a) Enrichment programs through grade three (3) using evidence-based reading
instruction and other strategies;
(b) Intensive instructional services, progress monitoring measures, and supports
to students through grade three (3); and
(c) Parents and legal guardians of students identified for accelerated interventions
in reading in kindergarten through grade three (3) with a "Read at Home"
plan, including information on how to participate in regular parent-guided
home reading.
(9) [Beginning in the 2024-2025 school year, ]If a student does not score in the
proficient performance level or higher in reading, as defined in KRS 158.791(2), on
the state annually required grade three (3) assessment, the local school district shall
provide:
(a) 1. Enrichment programs in grade four (4) using evidence-based reading
instruction and other strategies; or
Page 47 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
2. Intensive instructional services, progress monitoring measures, and
supports to students in grade four (4); and
(b) Written notification of the interventions and supports described in paragraph
(a) of this subsection to the parent or legal guardian of the student, including a
description of proposed interventions and supports to be provided.
(10) [By September 1, 2023, ]If funds are appropriated, the department shall establish
required teacher academies or coaching models for teachers of students in
prekindergarten through grade three (3). The teacher academies or coaching models
shall be related to evidence-based practices in instruction, instructional materials,
and assessment in reading.
(11) The department shall develop and maintain a web-based resource providing
teachers access to:
(a) Information on the use of specific screening processes and programs to
identify student strengths and needs, including those for advanced learners;
(b) Current, evidence-based research and age-appropriate instructional tools that
may be used for substantial, steady improvement in:
1. Reading when a student is experiencing difficulty with phonemic
awareness, phonics, vocabulary, fluency, general reading
comprehension, or reading in specific content areas, or is exhibiting
characteristics of dyslexia, aphasia, or other reading difficulties;
2. Writing when a student is experiencing difficulty with consistently
producing letters or numbers with accuracy or is exhibiting
characteristics of dysgraphia;
3. Mathematics when a student is experiencing difficulty with basic math
facts, calculations, or application through problem solving, or is
exhibiting characteristics of dyscalculia or other mathematical
difficulties; or
Page 48 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
4. Behavior when a student is exhibiting behaviors that interfere with his
or her learning or the learning of other students; and
(c) Current, evidence-based research and age-appropriate instructional tools that
may be used for continuous progress of advanced learners.
(12) The department shall encourage districts to utilize both state and federal funds as
appropriate to implement a district-wide multitiered system of supports.
(13) The department is encouraged to coordinate technical assistance and training on
current best practice interventions with state postsecondary education institutions.
(14) The department shall collaborate with the statewide reading research center
established under KRS 164.0207, the Kentucky Center for Mathematics, the
Kentucky Center for Instructional Discipline, the Education Professional Standards
Board, the Council on Postsecondary Education, postsecondary teacher education
programs, and other agencies and organizations as deemed appropriate to ensure
that teachers are prepared to utilize evidence-based interventions in reading,
writing, mathematics, and behavior.
(15) In compliance with 20 U.S.C. sec. 1414(a)(1)(E), screening of a student to
determine appropriate instructional strategies for curriculum implementation shall
not be considered to be an evaluation for eligibility for special education and related
services and nothing in this section shall limit a school district from completing an
initial evaluation of a student suspected of having a disability.
Section 9. KRS 158.4416 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) "Direct services" means in-person or virtual services provided directly to a
student by a school counselor, including but not limited to individual
counseling, group counseling, and individual student planning, scheduling,
and registration;
(b) "Indirect services" means services provided on behalf of a student as a result
Page 49 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
of interactions with others, including but not limited to consultation and
collaboration with parents, teachers, and other educators;
(c) "School counselor" means an individual who holds a valid school counselor
certificate issued in accordance with the administrative regulations of the
Education Professional Standards Board;
(d) "School psychologist" means an individual who holds a valid school
psychology certificate issued in accordance with the administrative
regulations of the Education Professional Standards Board;
(e) "School social worker" means an individual who holds a valid school social
work certificate issued in accordance with the administrative regulations of
the Education Professional Standards Board;
(f) "School-based mental health services provider" means a certified school
counselor, school psychologist, school social worker, or other qualified
mental health professional as defined in KRS 202A.011;
(g) "Trauma" means physical, emotional, or life-threatening harm; and
(h) "Trauma-informed approach" means incorporating principles of trauma
awareness and trauma-informed practices in a school in order to foster a safe,
stable, and understanding learning environment for all students and staff and
ensuring that all students are known well by at least one (1) adult in the school
setting.
(2) The General Assembly recognizes that all schools must provide a place for students
to feel safe and supported to learn throughout the school day, and that any trauma a
student may have experienced can have a significant impact on the ability of a
student to learn. The General Assembly directs all public schools to adopt a trauma-
informed approach to education in order to better recognize, understand, and
address the learning needs of students impacted by trauma and to foster a learning
environment where all students, including those who have been traumatized, can be
Page 50 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
safe, successful, and known well by at least one (1) adult in the school setting.[ The
requirements of this subsection shall apply to public charter schools as a health and
safety requirement under KRS 160.1592(1).]
(3) (a) As funds and qualified personnel become available:
1. Each school district[ and each public charter school] shall employ at
least one (1) school counselor in each school with the goal of the school
counselor spending at least sixty percent (60%) or more of his or her
time providing direct services to students and no more than forty percent
(40%) of his or her time providing indirect services to students; and
2. It shall be the goal that each school district[ and each public charter
school] shall provide at least one (1) school counselor or school-based
mental health services provider who is employed by the school district
for every two hundred fifty (250) students, including but not limited to
the school counselor required in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph.
(b) A school counselor or school-based mental health services provider at each
school shall be the facilitator of a trauma-informed team to identify and assist
students whose learning, behavior, and relationships have been impacted by
trauma. The trauma-informed team may consist of school administrators,
school counselors, school psychologists, school social workers, school-based
mental health services providers, community-based mental health services
providers hired by the district, family resource and youth services
coordinators, school nurses, school resource officers, and any other school or
district personnel.
(c) The trauma-informed team shall:
1. Provide assistance to school personnel to enable them to support
students whose learning, behavior, and relationships have been impacted
by trauma;
Page 51 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
2. Identify ways to recognize and respond to mental health issues in all
students;
3. Identify ways to build resiliency and wellness in all students;
4. Compile an annual record of its activities during the course of the school
year to be used in the annual comprehensive school improvement plan
process required by 703 KAR 5:225; and
5. Submit the record created in accordance with subparagraph 4. of this
paragraph to the department.
(d) Each school counselor or school-based mental health services provider
providing services pursuant to this section, and the trauma-informed team
members described in paragraph (b) of this subsection, shall provide training,
guidance, and assistance to other administrators, teachers, and staff on:
1. Recognizing symptoms of trauma in students;
2. Utilizing interventions and strategies to support the learning needs of
those students; and
3. Implementing the plan for a trauma-informed approach as described in
subsection (5) of this section.
(e) 1. School districts may employ or contract for the services of school-based
mental health services providers to assist with the development and
implementation of a trauma-informed approach and the development of
a trauma-informed team pursuant to this subsection and to enhance or
expand student mental health support services as funds and qualified
personnel become available.
2. School-based mental health services providers may provide services
through a collaboration between two (2) or more school districts or
between school districts and educational cooperatives or any other
public or private entities, including but not limited to local or regional
Page 52 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
mental health day treatment programs.
(f) No later than November 1 of each year, the local school district
superintendent shall report to the department the number of school-based
mental health service providers, the position held, placement in the district,
certification or licensure held, the source of funding for each position, a
summary of the job duties and work undertaken by each school-based mental
health service provider, and the approximate percent of time devoted to each
duty over the course of the year.
(g) The department shall annually compile and maintain a list of school-based
mental health service providers by district which shall include the information
required in paragraph (f) of this subsection.
(h) No later than June 1 of each year, the department shall provide the
appropriate Interim Joint Committee on Education with the information
reported by local school district superintendents and compiled in accordance
with paragraph (g) of this subsection.
(4) The Department shall make available a toolkit that includes guidance, strategies,
behavioral interventions, practices, and techniques to assist school districts[ and
public charter schools] in developing a trauma-informed approach in schools.
(5) Each local board of education[ and board of a public charter school] shall develop a
plan for implementing a trauma-informed approach in its schools. The plan shall
include but not be limited to strategies for:
(a) Enhancing trauma awareness throughout the school community;
(b) Conducting an assessment of the school climate, including but not limited to
inclusiveness and respect for diversity;
(c) Developing trauma-informed discipline policies;
(d) Collaborating with the Department of Kentucky State Police, the local sheriff,
and the local chief of police to create procedures for notification of trauma-
Page 53 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
exposed students; and
(e) Providing services and programs designed to reduce the negative impact of
trauma, support critical learning, and foster a positive and safe school
environment for every student.
(6) The trauma-informed approach plan developed in accordance with subsection (5) of
this section shall be reviewed and updated annually, incorporated into the annual
comprehensive district improvement plan required by 703 KAR 5:225, and
submitted to the department. The department shall annually provide a summary of
the trauma-informed approach strategies being used in districts to the board and the
Legislative Research Commission for referral to the appropriate Interim Joint
Committee on Education.
Section 10. KRS 158.4433 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "school mapping data" means mapping information
provided in an electronic or a digital format to assist first responders in responding
to emergencies at schools.
(2) (a) The General Assembly does hereby establish the School Mapping Data
Program to be administered by the Center for School Safety. The Center for
School Safety shall utilize available funds to develop school mapping data for
each public school[, public charter school,] and any private school that
requests to participate in the program. The program shall be administered by
the Center for School Safety pursuant to this section, which may include
contracting for services pursuant to the relevant provisions of the Kentucky
Model Procurement Code in KRS Chapter 45A. The Center for School Safety
shall be responsible for ensuring that all funds received for and expended
related to the School Mapping Data Program are utilized for the purposes of
school mapping.
(b) The Center for School Safety shall provide the data developed by the program
Page 54 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
to the state school security marshal, participating schools, participating
districts, and local law enforcement and public safety agencies for use in
response to emergencies and for conducting drills required under KRS
158.162(5). The school mapping data shall be excluded from the application
of KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(c) The Center for School Safety shall apply for any federal grant funds that may
be used to accomplish the purposes of the program. The Center for School
Safety may also solicit private funds to support the program.
(3) The School Mapping Data Program shall establish a single verified source of
mapping data for each participating school campus in the state that is standardized,
accurate, and accessible to public safety agencies to ensure efficient response to any
emergency on a school campus. The school mapping data provided shall:
(a) Be compatible with software platforms used by local, county, state, and
federal public safety agencies that provide emergency services to the specific
school for which the data is provided without requiring such agencies to
purchase additional software or requiring a fee to view or access the data;
(b) Be compatible with security software platforms in use by the participating
school or district for which the data is provided without requiring the school
or district to purchase additional software or requiring a fee to view or access
the data;
(c) Be in a printable format and, if requested by a law enforcement or public
safety agency or participating school or district in addition to those described
in paragraph (a) of this subsection, be in a digital file format that can be
integrated into interactive mobile platforms in use;
(d) Be verified by the Center for School Safety for accuracy by a walk-through of
school buildings and grounds;
(e) Be oriented to true north;
Page 55 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
(f) Include accurate floor plans overlaid on current, verified aerial imagery of
campus;
(g) Contain site-specific labeling that matches the structure of school buildings
that includes:
1. Room labels;
2. Hallway names or identifiers;
3. External door or stairwell numbers;
4. Locations of hazards;
5. Critical utility locations;
6. Key boxes;
7. Automated external defibrillators; and
8. Trauma kits;
(h) Contain site-specific labeling that matches the school grounds that includes:
1. Parking areas;
2. Athletic fields;
3. Surrounding roads; and
4. Neighboring properties;
(i) Be overlaid with a gridded coordinate system;
(j) Not be modified or updated independently without corresponding updates to
school mapping data within software platforms used by local, county, state,
and federal public safety agencies that provide emergency services to the
specific school; and
(k) Provide to public safety agencies and participating schools or districts the
school mapping data developed pursuant to the program perpetually and at no
cost to the public safety agencies or participating schools or districts.
(4) A participating school district or campus shall not be required to adopt new school
mapping data if, as of July 1, 2024, the school district or campus previously
Page 56 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
implemented school mapping data with capabilities that meet the requirements of
subsection (3)(a) to (k) of this section.
Section 11. KRS 158.8402 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Notwithstanding any other statute or administrative regulation to the contrary, the
Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to define and establish a multitiered system of
supports that shall include evidence-based mathematics instruction, intervention,
and instructional strategies for district-wide use for students in kindergarten through
grade three (3).
(2) By November 1, 2027, and each year thereafter, the department shall submit the
implementation status of the multitiered system of supports required pursuant to
subsection (1) of this section for all school districts to the Legislative Research
Commission for referral to the appropriate Interim Joint Committee on Education.
(3) The department shall provide technical assistance and training to local districts to
assist in the implementation of the district-wide, multitiered system of supports as a
means to identify and assist any student experiencing difficulty in mathematics.
(4) The technical assistance and training shall be designed to improve:
(a) The use of specific screening processes and diagnostic assessments to identify
student strengths and needs;
(b) The use of universal screening and diagnostic data for implementing
instruction and intervention, as needed;
(c) The use of valid and reliable evidence-based instructional strategies and
interventions for mathematics education;
(d) Progress monitoring of student performance; and
(e) Accelerated, intensive, direct instruction that addresses students' individual
differences, including advanced learners, and enables students that are
experiencing difficulty to catch up with typically performing peers.
Page 57 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
(5) (a) By January 1, 2026, each superintendent[ or public charter school board of
directors] shall select:
1. At least one (1) universal screener for mathematics that is determined by
the department to be valid and reliable to be administered to all students
in kindergarten through grade three (3); and
2. At least one (1) diagnostic assessment for mathematics that is
determined by the department to be reliable and valid to be administered
as part of a multitiered system of supports for students in kindergarten
through grade three (3).
(b) Each superintendent[ or public charter school board of directors] shall adopt
an evidence-based curriculum along with high-quality instructional resources
for mathematics that is determined by the department to be reliable, valid, and
aligned to Kentucky academic standards for mathematics required by KRS
158.6453 for kindergarten through grade three (3).
(c) All teachers of students in kindergarten through grade three (3)[, including
public charter school teachers,] shall be trained on any mathematics universal
screener and diagnostic assessment selected by the superintendent[ or public
charter school board] prior to administration of the assessment. The training
shall address:
1. How to properly administer the mathematics universal screener and
diagnostic assessment;
2. How to interpret the results of the mathematics universal screener and
diagnostic assessment to identify students needing interventions;
3. How to use the assessment results to design instruction and
interventions;
4. The use of the assessment to monitor the progress of student
performance; and
Page 58 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
5. The use of accelerated, intensive, and direct instruction that addresses
students' individual differences and enables students to achieve
proficiency in mathematics, including but not limited to daily, one-on-
one instruction.
(6) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, a universal screener determined by the
department to be valid and reliable shall be given in the first thirty (30) calendar
days of the school year to each student in kindergarten through grade three (3) at a
public school[ or public charter school].
(7) Those students determined to be at risk for not meeting grade-level benchmarks in
mathematics for kindergarten through grade three (3) based on the universal
screener shall be given a mathematics diagnostic assessment determined by the
department to be valid and reliable to identify the individual student deficits in
numeracy and other mathematical content and practices as listed in subsection (1)
of this section in the first forty-five (45) calendar days of the school year.
(8) A mathematics improvement plan shall be developed and implemented in the first
sixty (60) calendar days of the school year by a mathematics improvement team for
any student in kindergarten through grade three (3) identified as needing
accelerated interventions to progress toward proficient performance in mathematics.
The mathematics improvement plan shall require:
(a) Intensive intervention that includes effective instructional strategies and high-
quality instructional resources necessary to help the student make accelerated
progress toward proficient performance in mathematics and become ready for
the next grade, including but not limited to daily, one-on-one instruction with
students the most in need provided by certified teachers specifically trained
and most qualified to provide one-on-one instruction in numeracy; and
(b) Written quarterly progress reports provided by the school to a parent or
guardian of any student subject to a mathematics improvement plan. The
Page 59 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
written quarterly progress report for the mathematics improvement plan may
be included in the school's existing quarterly student progress report.
(9) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, if a student's rate of progress toward
proficient performance in mathematics needs accelerated interventions as
demonstrated by the results of an approved universal screener and mathematics
diagnostic assessment, the local school district shall provide:
(a) Enrichment programs using evidence-based mathematics instruction and other
strategies;
(b) Intensive instructional services, progress monitoring measures, and supports;
and
(c) Parents and legal guardians of students identified for accelerated interventions
in mathematics with information on how to encourage mathematics success at
home.
(10) By September 1, 2025, if funds are available, the department shall establish teacher
academies or coaching models for teachers of students in kindergarten through
grade eight (8). The teacher academies or coaching models shall be related to
evidence-based practices in instruction, instructional materials, and assessment in
mathematics.
(11) The department shall develop and maintain a web-based resource providing
teachers access to:
(a) Screening and diagnostic tools, universal screeners, screening processes, and
diagnostic assessments;
(b) Evidence-based curriculum;
(c) High quality instructional resources; and
(d) General supports and lesson plans.
(12) The department shall encourage districts to utilize both state and federal funds, as
appropriate, to implement a district-wide multitiered system of supports, including
Page 60 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
high-quality mathematics instruction and instructional resources, evidence-based
intervention strategies and materials, aligned curriculum-based professional
learning, and ongoing, job-embedded coaching supports.
(13) In compliance with 20 U.S.C. sec. 1414(a)(1)(E), screening of a student to
determine appropriate instructional strategies for curriculum implementation shall
not be considered an evaluation for eligibility for special education and related
services, and nothing in this section shall limit a school district from completing an
initial evaluation of a student suspected of having a disability.
Section 12. KRS 158.843 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky numeracy counts fund is hereby created for the purpose of training
and supporting teachers to improve the mathematics content and practices of
students in kindergarten through grade eight (8), as set forth in subsection (2) of this
section and KRS 158.8402(12). The fund shall consist of all moneys received from
state appropriations, gifts, grants, and federal funds for this purpose. The
department shall administer the fund.
(2) The department shall implement teacher professional learning academies related to
evidence-based practices in instruction, instructional materials, and assessment in
mathematics using moneys appropriated to or otherwise received by the Kentucky
numeracy counts fund.
(3) The department shall create a mathematics coaching program using moneys
appropriated to or otherwise received by the Kentucky numeracy counts fund. The
program shall:
(a) Use data coaches to improve mathematics instruction and intervention;
(b) Determine the effectiveness of intensive data-focused professional
development; and
(c) Provide expert support in mathematics instruction and intervention.
(4) (a) The department shall provide grants to local school districts[ and public
Page 61 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
charter schools]. The grant shall only be used to purchase approved high-
quality research and evidence-based curriculum aligned to kindergarten
through grade three (3) academic standards in mathematics and expenditures
for curriculum-based professional learning to implement new curriculum.
(b) To be eligible to receive a grant, a local school district[ or public charter
school] shall:
1. Submit an application in accordance with paragraph (c) of this
subsection; and
2. Agree to adopt a common comprehensive mathematics program that is
determined by the department to be reliable, valid, and aligned to
mathematics standards required by KRS 158.6453 and outlined in an
administrative regulation promulgated by the Kentucky Board of
Education.
(c) Local school districts shall submit applications that include a district-wide
plan[ and public charter schools shall submit applications that include a
school plan] for implementation of mathematics curriculum that includes:
1. How the district[ or public charter school] will implement the new
curriculum by school and by grade level; and
2. The timeline for the rollout of upgraded curriculum materials for core
instruction in classrooms.
(d) Available grant funding shall be distributed to eligible applicants based on a
rubric developed by the department. The rubric shall consider the information
provided in accordance with paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection and
prioritize applications from local school districts[ or public charter schools]:
1. In which more than fifty percent (50%) of the enrolled students scored
below the statewide average on the statewide assessments in
mathematics administered for the preceding school year;
Page 62 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
2. With the greatest need for financial assistance; and
3. That propose comprehensive plans most likely to increase student
achievement in mathematics.
[(e) The department shall distribute the awarded grant money to a public charter
school authorizer, and the authorizer shall distribute one hundred percent
(100%) of the grant money to the charter school.]
(5) Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 45.229, unexpended funds in the Kentucky
numeracy counts fund shall not lapse but shall carry forward to the next fiscal year
and shall be used for the purposes established in this section.
(6) Any interest earned on moneys in the fund shall become part of the fund and shall
not lapse.
Section 13. KRS 160.152 is amended to read as follows:
(1) For purposes of this section, "Kentucky Educator Placement Service System" or
"system" means the online statewide job posting system operated by the Kentucky
Department of Education for vacancies at local school districts[ and public charter
schools].
(2) The Kentucky Department of Education shall ensure that the Kentucky Educator
Placement Service System:
(a) Is accessible through the department's website;
(b) Includes a mechanism for local school districts[ and public charter schools] to
electronically submit job openings for posting on the system as provided in
subsection (4) of this section;
(c) Allows the public to review job postings;
(d) Allows potential applicants to electronically submit applications and relevant
application materials; and
(e) Permits school districts[ and public charter schools] to access, review, and
download applications and application materials.
Page 63 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
(3) Each job posting for a vacancy at a school district[ or public charter school] shall
include the school district's[ or public charter school's] policy against discrimination
in employment.
(4) School districts[ and public charter schools] shall electronically submit all job
postings to the system. All postings must include an opening and closing date for
each position posted.
(5) The Kentucky Department of Education shall operate and maintain the system to
ensure that job postings are current, including tracking each unique position posted,
monitoring for repeated position postings, and removing outdated postings, and to
collect accurate data about employment in public schools.
(6) Nothing in this section shall:
(a) Prohibit a school district[ or public charter school] from advertising job
openings and recruiting employees independently from the system;
(b) Prohibit a school district[ or public charter school] from using another method
of advertising job openings or another applicant tracking system in addition to
the system;
(c) Require all job applications for posted vacancies to be submitted digitally or
only be submitted through the system; or
(d) Provide the Kentucky Department of Education with any regulatory authority
in the hiring process or hiring decisions of any school district[ or public
charter school].
(7) The Kentucky Department of Education shall prepare a report detailing data from
the system and its implication for the status of employment in public schools,
including but not limited to the number and type of unique and duplicated job
postings, how often postings are viewed by the public, and positions that are
remaining vacant by type, certification requirement, and location. The report shall
be submitted to the appropriate Interim Joint Committee on Education by October
Page 64 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
1[, 2023, and] annually[ thereafter].
Section 14. KRS 160.153 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Military-connected student" means a child enrolled in a Kentucky public
school who is a dependent of a current or former member of the Armed
Forces of the United States, the Kentucky National Guard, or any reserve
component thereof; and
(b) "Purple star school" means any public or[,] private[, or public charter] school
serving any grades of kindergarten through twelfth grade that has committed
to supporting the educational and social-emotional needs of military-
connected students, as identified by the Kentucky Commission on Military
Affairs.
(2) The Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs shall establish the Purple Star
School Program and establish an application, review, and designation process for
eligible schools.
(3) To qualify as a purple star school, the school shall:
(a) Designate a staff member as a military liaison to serve as the point of contact
between the school and military-connected students and their families, whose
duties shall include:
1. Identifying military-connected students enrolled in the school;
2. Determining appropriate services available to military-connected
students;
3. Coordinating programs relevant to military-connected students;
4. Assisting military-connected students in transitioning into or out of the
school;
5. Facilitating optional professional development for staff members on
issues related to military-connected students;
Page 65 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
6. Completing a Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs purple star
school questionnaire to provide feedback for program improvements;
and
7. Completing Kentucky purple star school self-paced online training
events, including military youth in Kentucky;
(b) Maintain a web page on the school's website that includes a prominent display
of the Kentucky purple star logo provided by the Kentucky Commission on
Military Affairs, resources for military-connected students and their families,
and information regarding:
1. Relocation, enrollment, registration, and transferring records in the
school;
2. Academic planning, course sequences, and advanced classes available;
3. Counseling and other support services available for military-connected
students enrolled in the school; and
4. Contact information for the military liaison designated in this
subsection;
(c) Host at least one (1) military recognition event annually that connects the
school with the military community; and
(d) Submit an application for designation as a purple star school with the
Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs.
Section 15. KRS 161.164 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No employee of the local school district shall take part in the management or
activities of any political campaign for school board.
(2) No candidate for school board shall solicit or accept any political assessment,
subscription, contribution, or service of any employee of the school district.
(3) No person shall use or promise to use, directly or indirectly, any official authority
or influence, whether possessed or anticipated, to secure or attempt to secure for
Page 66 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
any person an appointment or advantage in appointment to a position as teacher or
employee of any district board of education, or an increase in pay or other
advantage in employment in any such position, for the purpose of influencing the
vote or political action of any person.
(4) No teacher or employee of any district board of education shall be appointed or
promoted to, or demoted or dismissed from, any position or in any way favored or
discriminated against with respect to employment because of his or her political or
religious opinions or affiliations or ethnic origin or race or color or sex or age or
disabling condition.
(5) Any instruction or instructional materials on current, controversial topics related to
public policy or social affairs provided to public school[ or public charter school]
students, regardless of whether the individual that provides the instruction is
employed by the local school district[ or public charter school], shall be:
(a) Within the range of knowledge, understanding, age, and maturity of the
students receiving the instruction; and
(b) Relevant, objective, nondiscriminatory, and respectful to the differing
perspectives of students.
(6) An employee of a public school district[ or public charter school] shall not violate a
student's First Amendment rights by requiring or incentivizing a student to advocate
in a civic space on behalf of a perspective with which the student or the parent or
guardian of a minor student does not agree.
(7) An employee of a local school district[ or public charter school] shall not be
required to engage in training, orientation, or therapy that coerces the employee to
stereotype any group.
(8) The local superintendent shall inform all school employees of the provisions of this
section.
Section 16. KRS 161.220 is amended to read as follows:
Page 67 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
As used in KRS 161.220 to 161.716 and 161.990:
(1) "Retirement system" means the arrangement provided for in KRS 161.220 to
161.716 and 161.990 for payment of allowances to members;
(2) "Retirement allowance" means the amount annually payable during the course of
his or her natural life to a member who has been retired by reason of service;
(3) "Disability allowance" means the amount annually payable to a member retired by
reason of disability;
(4) "Member" means the commissioner of education, deputy commissioners, associate
commissioners, and all division directors in the State Department of Education,
employees participating in the system pursuant to KRS 196.167(3)(b)1., and any
full-time teacher or professional occupying a position requiring certification or
graduation from a four (4) year college or university, as a condition of employment,
and who is employed by public boards, institutions, or agencies as follows:
(a) Local boards of education[ and public charter schools if the public charter
school satisfies the criteria set by the Internal Revenue Service to participate
in a governmental retirement plan];
(b) Eastern Kentucky University, Kentucky State University, Morehead State
University, Murray State University, Western Kentucky University, and any
community colleges established under the control of these universities;
(c) State-operated secondary area vocational education or area technology
centers, Kentucky School for the Blind, and Kentucky School for the Deaf;
(d) Other public education agencies as created by the General Assembly and
those members of the administrative staff of the Teachers' Retirement System
of the State of Kentucky whom the board of trustees may designate by
administrative regulation;
(e) Regional cooperative organizations formed by local boards of education or
other public educational institutions listed in this subsection, for the purpose
Page 68 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
of providing educational services to the participating organizations;
(f) All full-time members of the staffs of the Kentucky Association of School
Administrators, Kentucky Education Association, Kentucky Vocational
Association, Kentucky High School Athletic Association, Kentucky
Academic Association, and the Kentucky School Boards Association who
were members of the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System or were
qualified for a position covered by the system at the time of employment by
the association in the event that the board of directors of the respective
association petitions to be included. The board of trustees of the Kentucky
Teachers' Retirement System may designate by resolution whether part-time
employees of the petitioning association are to be included. The state shall
make no contributions on account of these employees, either full-time or part-
time. The association shall make the employer's contributions, including any
contribution that is specified under KRS 161.550. The provisions of this
paragraph shall be applicable to persons in the employ of the associations on
or subsequent to July 1, 1972;
(g) Employees of the Council on Postsecondary Education who were employees
of the Department for Adult Education and Literacy and who were members
of the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System at the time the department was
transferred to the council pursuant to Executive Order 2003-600;
(h) The Office of Career and Technical Education;
(i) The Office of Vocational Rehabilitation;
(j) The Kentucky Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children;
(k) The Governor's Scholars Program;
(l) Any person who is retired for service from the retirement system and is
reemployed by an employer identified in this subsection in a position that the
board of trustees deems to be a member, except that any person who becomes
Page 69 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
a member on or after January 1, 2022, and subsequently draws a monthly
lifetime retirement allowance, shall upon reemployment after retirement not
earn a second retirement account;
(m) Employees of the former Cabinet for Workforce Development who are
transferred to the Kentucky Community and Technical College System and
who occupy positions covered by the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System
shall remain in the Teachers' Retirement System. New employees occupying
these positions, as well as newly created positions qualifying for Teachers'
Retirement System coverage that would have previously been included in the
former Cabinet for Workforce Development, shall be members of the
Teachers' Retirement System;
(n) Effective January 1, 1998, employees of state community colleges who are
transferred to the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall
continue to participate in federal old age, survivors, disability, and hospital
insurance, and a retirement plan other than the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement
System offered by Kentucky Community and Technical College System. New
employees occupying positions in the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System as referenced in KRS 164.5807(5) that would not have
previously been included in the former Cabinet for Workforce Development,
shall participate in federal old age, survivors, disability, and hospital
insurance and have a choice at the time of employment of participating in a
retirement plan provided by the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System, including participation in the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System,
on the same basis as faculty of the state universities as provided in KRS
161.540 and 161.620;
(o) Employees of the Office of General Counsel, the Office of Budget and
Administrative Services, and the Office of Quality and Human Resources
Page 70 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
within the Office of the Secretary of the former Cabinet for Workforce
Development and the commissioners of the former Department for Adult
Education and Literacy and the former Department for Technical Education
who were contributing to the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System as of
July 15, 2000;
(p) Employees of the Kentucky Department of Education only who are graduates
of a four (4) year college or university, notwithstanding a substitution clause
within a job classification, and who are serving in a professional job
classification as defined by the department;
(q) The Governor's School for Entrepreneurs Program;
(r) Employees of the Office of Adult Education within the Department of
Workforce Development in the Education and Labor Cabinet who were
employees of the Council on Postsecondary Education, Kentucky Adult
Education Program and who were members of the Kentucky Teachers'
Retirement System at the time the Program was transferred to the cabinet
pursuant to Executive Orders 2019-0026 and 2019-0027; and
(s) Employees of the Education Professional Standards Board who were
members of the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System at the time the
employees were transferred to the Kentucky Department of Education
pursuant to Executive Order 2020-590;
(5) "Present teacher" means any teacher who was a teacher on or before July 1, 1940,
and became a member of the retirement system created by 1938 (1st Extra. Sess.)
Ky. Acts ch. 1, on the date of the inauguration of the system or within one (1) year
after that date, and any teacher who was a member of a local teacher retirement
system in the public elementary or secondary schools of the state on or before July
1, 1940, and continued to be a member of the system until he or she, with the
membership of the local retirement system, became a member of the state Teachers'
Page 71 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
Retirement System or who becomes a member under the provisions of KRS
161.470(4);
(6) "New teacher" means any member not a present teacher;
(7) "Prior service" means the number of years during which the member was a teacher
in Kentucky prior to July 1, 1941, except that not more than thirty (30) years' prior
service shall be allowed or credited to any teacher;
(8) "Subsequent service" means the number of years during which the teacher is a
member of the Teachers' Retirement System after July 1, 1941;
(9) "Final average salary" means the average of the five (5) highest annual salaries
which the member has received for service in a covered position and on which the
member has made contributions, or on which the public board, institution, or
agency has picked-up member contributions pursuant to KRS 161.540(2), or the
average of the five (5) years of highest salaries as defined in KRS 61.680(2)(a),
which shall include picked-up member contributions. Additionally, the board of
trustees may approve a final average salary based upon the average of the three (3)
highest salaries for individuals who become members prior to January 1, 2022, who
are at least fifty-five (55) years of age and have a minimum of twenty-seven (27)
years of Kentucky service credit. However, if any of the five (5) or three (3) highest
annual salaries used to calculate the final average salary was paid within the three
(3) years immediately prior to the date of the member's retirement for individuals
who become members prior to January 1, 2022, or within the five (5) years
immediately prior to the date of the member's retirement for individuals who
become members on or after January 1, 2022, the amount of salary to be included
for each of those three (3) years or five (5) years, as applicable, for the purpose of
calculating the final average salary shall be limited to the lesser of:
(a) The member's actual salary; or
(b) The member's annual salary that was used for retirement purposes during each
Page 72 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
of the prior three (3) years or five (5) years, as applicable, plus a percentage
increase equal to the percentage increase received by all other members
employed by the public board, institution, or agency, or for members of
school districts, the highest percentage increase received by members on any
one (1) rank and step of the salary schedule of the school district. The increase
shall be computed on the salary that was used for retirement purposes. The
board of trustees may promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A to establish a methodology for measuring the
limitation so that the combined increases in salary for each of the last three (3)
full years of salary prior to retirement shall not exceed the total permissible
percentage increase received by other members of the employer for the same
three (3) year period.
For individuals who became members of the retirement system prior to July 1,
2021, this limitation shall not apply if the member receives an increase in salary in a
percentage exceeding that received by the other members, and this increase was
accompanied by a corresponding change in position or in length of employment.
The board of trustees may promulgate an administrative regulation in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A to provide definitions for a corresponding change in
position or in length of employment. This limitation shall also not apply to the
payment to a member for accrued annual leave if the individual becomes a member
before July 1, 2008, or accrued sick leave which is authorized by statute and which
shall, for individuals subject to KRS 161.155(10) who became nonuniversity
members of the system prior to January 1, 2022, be included as part of a retiring
member's annual compensation for the member's last year of active service;
(10) "Annual compensation" means the total salary received by a member as
compensation for all services performed in employment covered by the retirement
system during a fiscal year. Annual compensation shall not include payment for any
Page 73 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
benefit or salary adjustments made by the public board, institution, or agency to the
member or on behalf of the member which is not available as a benefit or salary
adjustment to other members employed by that public board, institution, or agency.
Annual compensation shall not include the salary supplement received by a member
under KRS 157.197(2)(c), 158.6455, or 158.782 on or after July 1, 1996. Under no
circumstances shall annual compensation include compensation that is earned by a
member while on assignment to an organization or agency that is not a public
board, institution, or agency listed in subsection (4) of this section. In the event that
federal law requires that a member continue membership in the retirement system
even though the member is on assignment to an organization or agency that is not a
public board, institution, or agency listed in subsection (4) of this section, the
member's annual compensation for retirement purposes shall be deemed to be the
annual compensation, as limited by subsection (9) of this section, last earned by the
member while still employed solely by and providing services directly to a public
board, institution, or agency listed in subsection (4) of this section. The board of
trustees shall determine if any benefit or salary adjustment qualifies as annual
compensation. For an individual who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2008,
annual compensation shall not include lump-sum payments upon termination of
employment for accumulated annual or compensatory leave;
(11) "Age of member" means the age attained on the first day of the month immediately
following the birthdate of the member. This definition is limited to retirement
eligibility and does not apply to tenure of members;
(12) "Employ," and derivatives thereof, means relationships under which an individual
provides services to an employer as an employee, as an independent contractor, as
an employee of a third party, or under any other arrangement as long as the services
provided to the employer are provided in a position that would otherwise be
covered by the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System and as long as the services
Page 74 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
are being provided to a public board, institution, or agency listed in subsection (4)
of this section;
(13) "Regular interest" means:
(a) For an individual who becomes a member prior to July 1, 2008, interest at
three percent (3%) per annum;[:]
(b) For an individual who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2008, but prior to
January 1, 2022, interest at two and one-half percent (2.5%) per annum for
purposes of crediting interest to the teacher savings account or any other
contributions made by the employee that are refundable to the employee upon
termination of employment; and
(c) For an individual who becomes a member on or after January 1, 2022, the
rolling five (5) year yield on a thirty (30) year United States Treasury bond as
of the end of May prior to the most recently completed fiscal year, except
that:
1. Once the member has at least sixty (60) months of service in the system
it shall mean interest at two and one-half percent (2.5%) per annum for
purposes of crediting interest to employee contributions in the
foundational benefit component or any other contributions made by the
employee to the foundational benefit component that are refundable to
the employee upon termination of employment; and
2. The board shall have the authority to adjust the regular interest rate for
individuals who become members on or after January 1, 2022, in
accordance with KRS 161.633 and 161.634;
(14) "Accumulated contributions" means the contributions of a member to the teachers'
savings fund, including picked-up member contributions as described in KRS
161.540(2), plus accrued regular interest;
(15) "Annuitant" means a person who receives a retirement allowance or a disability
Page 75 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
allowance;
(16) "Local retirement system" means any teacher retirement or annuity system created
in any public school district in Kentucky in accordance with the laws of Kentucky;
(17) "Fiscal year" means the twelve (12) month period from July 1 to June 30. The
retirement plan year is concurrent with this fiscal year. A contract for a member
employed by a local board of education may not exceed two hundred sixty-one
(261) days in the fiscal year;
(18) "Public schools" means the schools and other institutions mentioned in subsection
(4) of this section;
(19) "Dependent" as used in KRS 161.520 and 161.525 means a person who was
receiving, at the time of death of the member, at least one-half (1/2) of the support
from the member for maintenance, including board, lodging, medical care, and
related costs;
(20) "Active contributing member" means a member currently making contributions to
the Teachers' Retirement System, who made contributions in the next preceding
fiscal year, for whom picked-up member contributions are currently being made, or
for whom these contributions were made in the next preceding fiscal year;
(21) "Full-time" means employment in a position that requires services on a continuing
basis equal to at least seven-tenths (7/10) of normal full-time service on a fiscal
year basis;
(22) "Full actuarial cost," when used to determine the payment that a member must pay
for service credit means the actuarial value of all costs associated with the
enhancement of a member's benefits or eligibility for benefit enhancements,
including health insurance supplement payments made by the retirement system.
The actuary for the retirement system shall determine the full actuarial value costs
and actuarial cost factor tables as provided in KRS 161.400;
(23) "Last annual compensation" means the annual compensation, as defined by
Page 76 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
subsection (10) of this section and as limited by subsection (9) of this section,
earned by the member during the most recent period of contributing service, either
consecutive or nonconsecutive, that is sufficient to provide the member with one (1)
full year of service credit in the Kentucky Teachers' Retirement System, and which
compensation is used in calculating the member's initial retirement allowance,
excluding bonuses, retirement incentives, payments for accumulated sick leave,
annual, personal, and compensatory leave, and any other lump-sum payment. For
an individual who becomes a member on or after July 1, 2008, payments for annual
or compensatory leave shall not be included in determining the member's last
annual compensation;
(24) "Participant" means a member, as defined by subsection (4) of this section, or an
annuitant, as defined by subsection (15) of this section;
(25) "Qualified domestic relations order" means any judgment, decree, or order,
including approval of a property settlement agreement, that:
(a) Is issued by a court or administrative agency; and
(b) Relates to the provision of child support, alimony payments, or marital
property rights to an alternate payee;
(26) "Alternate payee" means a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of a
participant, who is designated to be paid retirement benefits in a qualified domestic
relations order;
(27) "University member" means an individual who becomes a member through
employment with an employer specified in subsection (4)(b) and (n) of this section;
(28) "Nonuniversity member" means an individual who becomes a member through
employment with an employer specified under subsection (4) of this section, except
for those members employed by an employer specified in subsection (4)(b) and (n)
of this section;
(29) "Accumulated employer contribution" means the employer contribution deposited
Page 77 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
to a member's account through the supplemental benefit component and regular
interest credited on such amounts as provided by KRS 161.635 for nonuniversity
members and KRS 161.636 for university members;
(30) "Accumulated account balance" means:
(a) For members who began participating in the system prior to January 1, 2022,
the member's accumulated contributions; or
(b) For members who began participating in the system on or after January 1,
2022, the combined sum of the member's accumulated contributions and the
member's accumulated employer contributions;
(31) "Foundational benefit component" means the benefits provided by KRS 161.220 to
161.716 to individuals who become members on or after January 1, 2022, except
for the supplemental benefit component and retiree health benefits set forth in KRS
161.675; and
(32) "Supplemental benefit component" means:
(a) The benefit established pursuant to KRS 161.635 for individuals who become
nonuniversity members on or after January 1, 2022; or
(b) The benefit established pursuant to KRS 161.636 for individuals who become
university members on or after January 1, 2022.
Section 17. KRS 218B.045 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A registered qualified patient or visiting qualified patient who uses medicinal
cannabis shall be afforded all the same rights under state and local law, including
those guaranteed under KRS Chapter 344, as the individual would have been
afforded if he or she were solely prescribed pharmaceutical medications as they
pertain to drug testing required by any state or local law.
(2) A cardholder otherwise entitled to custody of, or visitation time or parenting time
with, a minor child shall not be denied that right, and there shall be no presumption
of abuse, neglect, or dependency for conduct permitted under this chapter unless the
Page 78 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
person's actions in relation to medicinal cannabis created an unreasonable danger to
the safety of the minor child as established by clear and convincing evidence.
(3) (a) For the purposes of medical care, including organ transplants, a patient's
authorized use of medicinal cannabis is the equivalent of the authorized use of
any other medication used at the direction of a practitioner.
(b) A health facility as defined in KRS 216B.015 may develop policies to allow a
patient who is a registered qualified patient or visiting qualified patient to use
medicinal cannabis on the premises of the health facility.
(4) (a) A school shall not refuse to enroll, or otherwise penalize, a person solely for
his or her status as a cardholder, unless failing to do so would violate federal
law or regulations and cause the school to lose a monetary or licensing-related
benefit under federal law or regulations.
(b) A school shall not be penalized or denied any benefit under state law for
enrolling a cardholder.
(c) Each local board of education[, each board of directors of a public charter
school,] and the governing body of each certified nonpublic school shall[, no
later than December 1, 2024,] establish policies related to the use of medicinal
cannabis by a pupil who is a registered qualified patient on school property.
Policies enacted pursuant to this paragraph shall either prohibit the use of
medicinal cannabis on school property or permit the use of medicinal
cannabis on school property by a pupil who is a registered qualified patient as
deemed necessary by the pupil's parent or legal guardian. If a local board of
education[, the board of directors of a public charter school,] or the governing
body of a certified nonpublic school enacts a policy to permit the use of
medicinal cannabis by a pupil who is a registered qualified patient, that policy
shall:
1. Require medicinal cannabis be administered:
Page 79 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
a. i. By a school nurse or under the supervision of appropriate
school staff; or
ii. By the parent or legal guardian of the pupil who is a
registered qualified patient; and
b. Out of view of other students; and
2. Include a process by which a school nurse or other school staff member
may refuse to administer or supervise the administration of medicinal
cannabis.
Section 18. The following KRS sections are repealed:
160.1590 Definitions for KRS 160.1590 to 160.1599.
160.1591 Legislative findings and declarations -- Public charter school project.
160.15911 Kentucky Public Charter School Pilot Project -- Authorizers -- Approval of
charter application -- Collective may act as substitute authorizer -- Annual report --
Performance review -- Contract renewal.
160.1592 Public charter schools part of state's public education system -- Exemption
from laws and regulations -- School requirements -- Enrollment option information
for parents -- Board of directors -- Buildings and grounds, liability insurance, and
other undertakings -- Requirement to be nonsectarian and nondiscriminatory --
Authorized grade levels -- Programs and services for students with disabilities --
Participation in athletic, academic, and other programs -- Single-sex public charter
schools permitted -- Amendments to charter contract -- Acceptance of credits
earned and grades received in public charter school -- Leave of absence to teach in
public charter school.
160.1593 Application to establish public charter school -- Submission to authorizer and
state board -- Required application information.
160.1594 Public charter school authorizer -- Duties -- Application reviews and decisions
-- Criteria for approval -- Explanation of decision -- Submission to Department of
Page 80 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1758
Education -- School board member charter authorization training.
160.1595 Request for technical assistance -- Appeal of approval or denial to state board
-- Judicial review -- Joint oversight.
160.1596 Board of directors of public charter schools -- Required elements of charter
contract with authorizer -- Calculation of daily average attendance -- Proportional
transfer of funds -- Services -- Negotiation by collaborative -- Calculations for first
year -- Authorizer fee -- Schedule for funds transfer -- Grants -- Share of state and
federal funds -- Distribution of closed school's assets -- Administrative regulations -
- Annual report by authorizer.
160.1597 Term of approved charter school contract -- Contract between board of
directors and authorizer's governing body -- Corporate powers -- Prohibition against
tax levies and use of eminent domain -- Immunity from liability.
160.1598 Renewal or nonrenewal of charter contract -- School performance report --
Reasons for nonrenewal or revocation -- Administrative regulations -- Report of
action taken and reason for decision -- School closure protocol.
160.1599 Conversion of public noncharter school to public charter school --
Establishment requirements -- Administrative regulations -- Governance --
Enrollment requirements -- Employees -- Collective bargaining -- School
facilities.
161.141 Participation in retirement systems -- State-sponsored insurance program --
Appropriations for retirement and insurance -- Sick leave credit -- Requirements
and prohibitions concerning public charter school employees and local school
boards -- Employees of education service provider.
Page 81 of 81
XXXX 2/13/2025 1:53 PM Jacketed